There are so many juicy tidbits embedded on the sides of pages as well...I LOVED the idea of a Grab and Go Binder...a binder which organizes and holds all your important papers and can be "grabbed" in a hurry should you need to leave quickly. (Lisa takes all the guess work out of the organization and makes a checklist for you to follow)
I was so happy to hear that she-baby was a 'she' because Oak was MEANT to have a daughter. And to know that, all you would have to do is see how she acts towards her girlfriends, and hear about her relationship with her Mom. That is a very lucky girl in there...especially since she has a TANK of an older brother to always protect her :)
"Sorry, I've only got cash on me today!" (lies, I never carry cash.)
But something mysterious happened yesterday. After unpacking the kids’ lunches and washing & drying the mountain of plastic containers, double checking that all homework was complete and organizing the preparation of dinner, I found myself asking my youngest if he’d like to play something.
The exhibition runs until the 5 December. It's a collection of new prints and hand-cut illustrations from the book, along with a selection of cards, laser cuts, plates, bunting, books and mugs always available at Castor + Pollux. Great for some early Christmas shopping!
Scary, indeed.
Exactly the same thing is said of action -- good fight scenes are not REAL fighting.
Robbie Williams Angels UK
2) The age categories will be split into four:
I am happy to bring you another wonderful Style Talk interview this week. Today I am speaking with one of my favorite interior designers, Kim Myles. I have been following Kim's work since she was a contestant on HGTV Design Star, and then the host of Myles of Style on HGTV. A few months ago, I was excited to discover Kim's wonderful blog. After becoming a dedicated reader, I knew I had to ask her to participate in Style Talk and I am so happy she said yes! Today we discuss Kim's design philosophy, blogging, and what's next for this design diva.
16. Badgers dig. A LOT. And the entry holes are the perfect size for your foot to slide in and break your ankle or leg.
The religious leaders ofIsraelwere rejecting the witness of Jesus Christ, the manifestation of the Holy Spirit and the offer of the Kingdom of heaven.
This month I decided to take a break and hand things over to my two and a half year old daughter for this month's music picks. I've never been a parent who wants to inundate their child with their own personal tastes but I haven't strayed from playing music around my little wonder either. She loves to dance and will start doing so whenever she hears something she likes. These wound up being her favorites over the past two years, with no coercion or suggestions from me or the Mrs. (well she heard "Click Click" by some mediocre band in "Shrek 4" and I decided she need to hear the original....and she couldn't tell the difference and bursts into spontaneous fits of dance when she hears it on my iPod):
Steve and I have started to get ready for the spring, it's not too far away you know. We have started to prepare the garden beds at the allotment (Steve's parents house), we are making the gardens a bit smaller and higher this year so the are easier to reach across when weeding and planting etc. We are also going to add a couple of extra beds to compensate for the lost space.
and bone
Just before Christmas we received an email from PetNaturals® of Vermont, informing us of their products and asking if we would try one of their products and blog about it. In return we would receive a years supply of Calming Soft-chews for Cats. A product I felt would benefit us not only for Ms K on New Years day but especially Oliver, who as you know is with my daughter at UCSC and you shall meet once I visit them in a couple of weeks.
30 Mauve, 30 yellow, 30 Red , 30 orange, 30 pink, 30 green 30 Blue and 30 Miscellaneous.
The music:
On the eye – In hair-salon terms, this is 'strawberry' blond.
By being 100% responsible for your life, you learn to be able to respond to your own needs, build a sense of personal authority and save yourself because no one else is coming to rescue you.
Contemporary dance is also in store at the Arena, with Retina Dance presenting Layers Of Skin.
October 13, 1902 Pg 3
Luckily, I didnt have to wait long before I was taken to my ‘job rep’ and one step closer to fucking off and going to bed. Not to judge a book by its cover or anything but on approach my rep appeared to be an incredbily fat, depressed , 20 somthing that i was going to take an instant dislike to. If I was to judge a book by its cover, and I am, she was all 32 harbound copies of Encyclopedia Britannica wrapped into one, except she wasnt full of general knowledge she was full of shit. I’m possibly being unfair but on a serious note, she was one broken chair away from prescription Zumba! I really dont have anything against fat people but apparently I do when I’ve had no sleep.
Put a layer of quinoa across the zucchini,
Hatred of women.
We have been asked to support mothers' rights in a similar case in Spain, that of Habiba and her daughter.
It is fall again. This was always one of my most favorite times of the year. But now, when the air changes to cooler and wind starts blowing, my mood seems to change some too. The new crisp air and the cloudy days bring me straight back to fall two years ago, and make me think so much of Ella. That was the time when life changed forever and we went from so excited to devastated in an instant. It boggles my mind that was almost two years ago. The last two days have been the cloudy cool days- the same exact way I remember the weather the day we found out about the anencephaly. I guess those feelings will always come back with the change of the season.
Oh, and I've also been busy in the garden. You can check out pictures of our garden right after I planted it HERE. I know that we put ours in late (my sister is already harvesting green beans and my bean plants are still tiny), but things are moving along on the produce front in our yard.
That he’d slipped away last night
I hope I can teach my little girl that in the same way that we tend to and care for our flowers and plants that we need to tend to and care for our spirit. I hope I can teach her that praying and reading her bible is like watering a thirsty flower and it will refresh her and give her strength. I hope I can show her through example that in the same way we pull the weeds in our garden that try to hinder the plants growth, we need to pull the weeds in our lives that hinder our growth and spiritual health. I hope that I can teach her to pull weeds of fear. Pull weeds of hatred. Pull weeds of gossip, envy and strife. I hope I can teach her to pull weeds of pride and of shame to make room for the fruits of the spirit to grow and thrive in her. It is not easy to hold on to these virtues or on to faith at times. The weeds are always popping up, the dry seasons come, the storms beat down and the pests attack. When those times come for my little one, I hope she will remember that she is never alone. The gardener will always be there to protect and strengthen her. The gardener never gives up on His garden and under his care all things thrive. Jesus.
(Silver Palate Cookbook Good Times Cookbook)
About the company: Dream Big Toy Company created Go! Go! Sports Girls as a fun and educational way to promote self-appreciation and the benefits of daily exercise, healthy eating and sleeping habits, self-esteem and overall healthy life-skills for girls ages 3-12. Go! Go! Sports Girls are age and size appropriate. They do not encourage an older or overly mature image. The image is innocent with a subtle yet strong message - appreciate and be true to yourself! At Dream Big Toy Company, we feel strongly about giving back. A portion of our profits is donated to organizations that encourage girls to participate in physical activity and develop healthy lifestyles.
The fact is, I don’t know much about how movies are made.
The Metropolitan Opera fills up every night as the
Hello dear readers!
Then my copy edits arrived.
MPRC: A visitor in the reserve will find inherent hospitality in their hosts, delicious gastronomy, and eco-lodges to suit the needs of any traveler, from the most difficult to please, to family groups who come to camp.
It's hard enough for a younger person to survive in this fading industry. For a 70-year-old to still be at it is admirable, to say the least. Astonishing, if you want to know the truth. There's nothin' easy about workin' on the water.
electricity are a tightly-knit group, and no industrial civilization can have
As I've been thinking through all of this, I've realized that this is OUR journey and no one elses. Like snowflakes, each person's journey is unique and beautiful in it's own way. It doesn't have to fit into a mold or follow a specific path to be "good enough" or worthy of being called a blessing. God leads us down a path allowing us to choose whether to take the fork to the left or the fork to the right. We may choose differently from others around us, but that's ok. Differences are part of the beauty in life.
If 6 apples are worth 18 cents, how many apples must be given for 5 oranges, worth 6 cents each?
I am sitting in my apartment allowing the cool spring air to flow freely through my opened balcony slider and through a few opened windows. The sun is brightly shining in a blue sky absent of clouds. A mockingbird is cheerfully sending various and repetitive calls into the morning air. I am lollygagging on my computer, in blogging forums, reading, and not accomplishing much at all.
Always the goal on the south side is to hide the north wall of the hulking grey house next door. Its greyness blends with the sky, and it has no high nosily overlooking windows, but until trees grow up to hide it the sense of Crank’s Roost privacy will be incomplete.
The Met said it would investigate claims the poll in the Banglatown and Spitalfields ward had been rigged — giving victory to Gulam Robbani, an independent candidate backed by the borough’s mayor Lutfur Rahman. He won by just 43 votes… one-in-seven of the postal votes cast in the by-election was rejected.
And suddenly I wasn't just walking down the street surrounded by the discarded past, I was part of an urban fantasy scavenger hunt. I'd found treasure! I whipped out the camera, snapped some pics and thought how simply fortunately it is that Guskind decided to share his views of Brooklyn and imagination with us.
CENTRE FOR THE STUDY OF EDUCATION AND WORK – UPDATE 21st AUGUST 2010
Obviously I'm a Mary and will be ordering my shirt right quick. Oh, it's the little things people. The little things.
My goodness!
By dens of lions encompassed,
When I first jumped in, I really familiarized myself with a lot of legal terms and how deals are structured. Ron has an e-book called How To Licence Your Music in Movies and Television. It’s great, and gives you the right information to bring you up to speed. Having already gone to school for music business made the transition that much quicker, as I was already familiar with the terms. I became familiarized with the fees and commonalities for the shows we were working on, such as Heartland and Flashpoint, and began to better understand the current landscape of television licensing in Canada. From there I became more involved, and eventually I started handling the music searches, music editing, license negotiating and tracking, etc. Although it is perfected with time and experience, you kind of just develop an intuition for what is right and what is wrong. This is both a natural intuition and one that is taught and improved upon by being taught by experienced professionals such as Ron Proulx, Chris Robinson and Andrea Higgins. They all really helped expand my horizons and knowledge base. Right now I’m working on a Spanish series for the Food Network and there are many forms of Latin music out there; it’s so important to be very particular about what is used in a show that is based in a specific region, like Spain. Music education/knowledge is a huge part of it all, and I keep working on furthering mine.
After spending a short 30 mins in the restaurant, I headed out to photograph the beautiful sunny day of Sheung Wan (I took my Ricoh GRD IV with me). The GRD gives me flexibility to use different angles to capture what’s in front of my eyes. It’s small enough to slip it in my vest pocket. So I jogged through some backstreets in the area for a good 15mins.
Nottingham Trent Carmen Tomas, Centre for Academic Development and Quality – working on internal assessment and feedback project. Starting project on making late submission processes electronic.
At long last love has arrived
I had bought some drawer pulls but then decided that I just didn't really like them.
their sighs of passion
Giant (15'), 4-armed humanoids. They roam the desert in small bands of hunter-gathers and are often captured for gladiatorial games due to their impressive size, low intellect and unusual fighting abilities.
I know the blogosphere is a fickle b*tch, but come on!
"A Short History of George Younger & Son Limited, Alloa, (1762 - 1925)", 1925, page 2.
Spies said the attachment was not a recovery for damages for farmers who had lost their land.
Cheers to champagne… truffles.
living one day at a time;
Public Health is a construct. Individuals have interests, not elected or appointed health authorities. These entities have goals, and they are seldom aligned with the best interests of the public but rather with the political authority that governs their budget and administration. It would be much more correct to say “In the interest of attaining the goals of the current administration” or in the interest of promoting the agenda of a government preferred NGO. (Non-Governmental Organization) Smoking Bans are most assuredly not in the best interest of public health but rather in the interests of the pharmaceutical companies manufacturing “Nicotine Replacement Therapies” and the highly questionable NGO’s campaigning for the implementation of Smoking Bans on their behalf.
I would love to hear your ideas for encouraging your children to be walkers and enjoy the great outdoors.
There is no time for the chance to wonder why
I walked over to my mom to ask her opinion. She grabbed my hand and shrieked, "That ring features two pollinators! Your father would be so proud!"
K and I watched the game at home with some grilled steaks and veggies. It was definitely an intense and fun game, except for the last 20 minutes. I feel like the timbers lose their mojo at the end of every game. They need more endurance… A bigger will to win!
Check back soon to see who is on the other end of the phone, and how one call can change our heroine’s entire life…
About two weeks ago, a bill was introduced in the US House of Representatives as is common practice in Washington. This bill—H.R. 4470—was introduced by Rep. Maxine Waters (D-CA) and has been called the Routine HIV Screening Coverage Act of 2012. What the bill proposes to do can be inferred from its name, with the added mandate that the routinization of HIV testing be implemented by health plans without imposing any cost sharing requirements on the patient or denying anyone coverage due to a lack of “appropriate risk factors”. Seems like a slam dunk, right? HIV/AIDS treatment and prevention have been at the forefront of national and international healthcare policy for going on two decades and anything that would help inform the 1 in 5 HIV positive Americans who are unaware of their status and unknowingly spreading the disease is a no brainer. Well, not exactly.
Healthy Hair Food No. 5: Poultry
Now could we get into some detail about why this is so significant?
For years now through teaching friends about Ivey, training teachers at her school, discussing her at conferences, my own classwork, even the Dialogue in the Dark (which absolutely about sent me over the edge from overwhelming fear of her deafblind word) -- I have attempted, yet these tries are merely simulations. Pretend. No matter how real we try to make the experience, it will never be Ivey's experiences.
Martha Stewart boarder punch.
Britten tells his therapists, both the real Dr. Evans and the imaginary Dr. Lee, that he is willing to move with Hannah to Portland. However, in real life, he'll be remaining in Los Angeles with Rex. Both therapists think that moving to Portland will weaken Britten's ability to maintain the reality of his dream, and that Britten will finally recognize it for the dream it is -- which means acknowledging that one member of his family really is dead. Dr. Evans predicts that Britten will fight against the loss of his dream Hannah, but will eventually give in. Britten assures her that he will not. "This thing works because I make it work."
I appreciate every single customer and every one of you that stop by.
In anticipation of the shutdown of Apple’s MobileMe service, I am re-posting some of my old blog entries before they become harder to retrieve.
Business supplies, forms, and tools
His heart fluttered, almost painfully. What was he to understand of this? This young heartbroken woman, how could she be the mother he’d never known? His mind was spinning, he could hardly concentrate. He’d have to speak more to her. In the morning, yes. He took another sip of the strong wine. Yes, she was right, he didn’t have to get there that night; he could do it the next day. No one could blame him for a little delay on a night like that. How well he was there, how warm, his stomach quieted for once. He rested his head on the table, in the cradle of his forearms, and closed his eyes. A small hand came to stroke his hair, the fire crackled, the baby cooed. He abandoned himself to sleep.
Today we are expecting rain which is a good thing. We need it. My lawn is half dead....lol
We also began music via K12 and I'm not sure what I think about it yet. It has a lot of parts and pieces and sheets and things and really, I think we could just clap along to some folk songs and get the same education. We'll keep plugging at it though and I hope my opinion improves as time goes on.
BioAdvance, which is based in the Science Center Port, is one of three organizations established by the state to boost the biotechnology industry.
I like this advert a lot - but does it strike anyone else that the moment that Jack Black says 'I'm not your puppet!' constitutes a mind-bending nexus of irony?
So… never lose Hope!
Anyway, here's the tried-and-true "classic" on an album that I'll admit has been treated like a bit of a wallflower in The Beatles' discography. Not only is it a "classic" (again, note the floating quotes) Beatle tune, it's a great Beatle tune.
I want to stop, and thank you baby
Diary of a Madman - Ozzy Osboune's Blizzard of Oz
SLR Camera Deals
22 And he answered, Thou shalt not smite them: wouldest thou smite those whom thou hast taken captive with thy sword and with thy bow? set bread and water before them, that they may eat and drink, and go to their master.
Her lonely little grave
As always, I had my trusty camera beside me. (Yes, like Mary's little lamb in the nursery rhyme, it went everywhere with me in NYC, as it always does.) And when I noticed the reflections in the interior of this lamp above our table, I had to ask permission to use my camera. Just as you would have, too.
Angela Rockett Ever since my studio was moved out of my home, just the act of entering my studio is enough to get me started. But to really get into the groove, I've got to have music playing, and each day seems to require a different type, from classical to international to pop. Yesterday it was the Peter Gabriel's soundtrack to the movie Rabbit-Proof Fence, today it was Depeche Mode. Go figure. Something with a strong beat usually works the best.
remove the pan from the fridge and pour on the melted chocolate. make an even layer and return it to the fridge.
I have book two so I will read it, I actually started it first by mistake, oh bad me, so I quickly started book 1 instead ;) But book 2 seemed good too.
But now we are here and have almost unpacked all the boxes. I've refurbished a thrift store find into my new art work table and have a beautiful studio loft above our detached garage. And I am itching to get back to my paint brushes and paper mache creations.
What do you call the kind of spice that has an oval-shaped body and extremely long legs?
SUBJECT: StellaDella’s dirty knees
It will be worth all the trouble, I know. But from right here and right now it seems like a long way off.
Compatible with 50Hz/60Hz.
That was the last day Jenny had a family for a long time. She didn’t go to the funeral because she was in the hospital having tests, and the people taking care of her thought a four year old was too young to go to such an event.
This is fairly heady stuff for a farm lad from one of the Greek provinces, but even more honours were to follow when Hadrian asked him to be his personal attendant on a hunting trip, and eventually into his bed.
The poem is made up of eleven stanzas, each with four lines. Fact about me: eleven and four are my lucky numbers—I was born 11/11 and my brother was born 4/4. But just like the facts in this poem, I don’t think this matters to you as much as it matters to me. Similarly, I think the facts in this poem mattered to Levine because they belong to him. But he shares them in such a beautiful, unique and rhythmic way that we can’t help but feel connected. The way he separates his thoughts makes each fact seem separate but of equal importance. This, along with his rhythmic choices, makes it feel so fluid when Levine draws our attention to something or when he refers back and forth between stanzas (i.e., “there are two lies in the previous stanza”) like he’s trying to get us to see the bigger picture.
as a gift with a purchase of $50 or more.
Sunny's a modern kind of girl.
The video’s directors (Peter Simonite and Annie Gunn, according to the Youtube post) cleverly use the song’s structure (a slow start, building up over the course of the song to a cathartic crescendo then fade at the end) as a metaphor for life’s progress.
Jessica Simpson is also finding herself in a similarly sticky situation. The girl has brass balls because she made an absolute replica of a Christian Louboutin heel. She might have thought nothing of it since the shoe in question was released in 2010 and sold out immediately, but good old bloggers and fashionista’s caught the knockoff and sounded off immediately after it was released. The Louboutin heel retailed for $995 and Simpson’s for a fraction at $98. It remains to be seen if the sue-happy designer will take Simpson to task for the faux Louboutin which would not surprise us, as he previously took Yves Saint Laurent to court over YSL making heels with Loub’s signature red sole. Incidentally the judge threw the case out saying “in fashion, color is an ingredient.”
“I never give them hell. I just tell the truth and they think it is hell.”
recently joined an
DW: How do you prove that?
The best technique to water plants is to do it during the cooler times of the day. While it differs by plants, in general, plants need about an inch of water each week. During hotter times, this will probably work out to about three times a week. When you have gotten this far, you will be able to watch your plants and flowers grow.
“My looks?”
Genre: Animated comedy
3. Bake for 20 minutes, or until fruit is fork tender and juices start to run out.
Tactics change, weapons change, but war itself remains much the same throughout the centuries, and a great warrior must know how to define success. Understanding where each of these three great (but flawed) commanders succeeded and failed can serve anyone who wants to think strategically or has to demonstrate leadership. In Masters of Command, Barry Strauss explains the qualities these great generals shared, the keys to their success, from ambition and judgment to leadership itself.
CHICAGO, IL 60622
I want to use fabrics I have on hand so as to make this project as inexpensive as possible.
The Wise Fool: Fables from the Islamic World by Shahrukh Husain, illustrations by Micha Archer (Barefoot Books, 2011). Meet Mulla Nasruddin, a legendary character whose adventures and misadventures are enjoyed across the Islamic world (Grade 5 & under).
Alex had one of the better character arcs, starting out as Jay’s girlfriend and majorly kicking ass and taking names with him and most of his hookups when he gave her a social disease and cheated on her. She then realized she was a lesbian and had an on-off relationship with Paige for a while. Her mother was also and idiot who dated this deadbeat that ran up their credit and got arrested for embezzlement charges. Forced to make ends meet Alex had to strip! But then idiot mom took her skripper tips and bailed deadbeat bf out of jail. Way to put your child first, Mom. She eventually got written off to stay with a cousin who lived in the boondocks of Canada. Random fun fact: there was a rumor circulating that the chick who played Alex was going to be in a live action movie adaptation of Sailor Moon as one of the Sailor Scouts. Clearly, that didn’t happen.
Liechtenstein prince in showdown
Audio
Forever 21 coat, shirt, and black dress, Shoes- Jeffery Campbell, vintage beret
I married a man who was a Lutheran. Before we were married we talked over what we believed (more than once) and the big stuff lined up. The Man grew up ELCA but when he returned to the church after walking away, he became more conservative. We currently attend a WELS church (think of the two as different denominations under the umbrella of Lutherans). One thing I appreciate is the liturgical style of worship. I’m not sure I would have appreciated it growing up but I appreciate it as an adult (that’s not to say that I don’t miss a contemporary style of worship because I do, but that’s a whole other post). It was here that I was first introduced to the Lenten season.
did for cotton in Gemena.
They try so much
How many graves have I stood before now and cried? I have lost count. How many times have I told the ancestors you have a wonderful family you would be proud of? How many times have I walked up to a grave and felt somehow there was love there for me? I cannot say.
So then I started squeezing my extreme couponing extravaganzas into lunch breaks and during the hour between getting off work and his daycare closing. I thought I had it all figured out. I could save money and not upset my son. I was proud of myself.
Saturday, Rebecca and I headed to New Mexico Tech and Bosque del Apache on a scouting trip for the all-day Birdathon planned for later this week. With migration getting a little bit of a late start this year and landscaping work at NM Tech removing some of the earlier good habitat, it was quieter than at this time last year, but right at the start we saw our first Cedar Waxwings for the year
Lauer noted that in a pre-Super Bowl interview three years ago, Obama had said “If I don’t have this done in three years, then there’s going to be a one-term proposition.”
Rest in peace precious treasure. Your aunty loves you so very much.
With the new US season pending, we’re in a bit of a time crunch, but that didn’t stop us from slacking off last week.
“In everything one must consider the end.” (Jean De La Fontaine)
Love Will Reach You
the arrest report.
I HATE not having some sort of hair down..if it's side-swept bangs or whatever.
Put the rice in a food processor or blender, and whirl until coarsely powdered.
The flowers and roses I create in color with my airbrush.
At the end of 1995, the original players were in their 20s, and many had not left. The standard of repertoire excluded the school-age population of young musicians, and it became clear that most of them would never reach a level on their respective instruments high enough to join the orchestra before leaving school.
Simply book your cruise with a participating cruise agency and you’ll earn airline miles. You’ll earn airline miles on all cabin types from inside to suite. You get one mile for every dollar spent, including port charges, government fees, and taxes.
sing it me with now
» communicates via network-MIDI-protocol
The bike was on the other end waiting for the response of my injury. The bike had two small children, a man with specs and a woman that appeared to be his wife. People gathered and planned to act against the man in the bike. I convinced them that I was fine and let the man go as he is with his family. Soon the people took my bike up and made me relax and went.
Leading the first Maha Mahal Retreat is Janaka Ordonez, whose traditional training from the Sivananda tradition is modernized by the ever-present ocean he connects with when he surfs. Through his practice of Kriya Yoga and knowledge of Native American Medicine Janaka’s intuition and feel for the subtle working in the Earth amplifies the energetic practice.
Susan May Warren is the RITA award-winning author of over thirty novels with Tyndale, Barbour, Steeple Hill and Summerside Press. A four-time Christy award finalist, a two-time RITA Finalist, she’s also a multi-winner of the Inspirational Readers Choice award, and the ACFW Carol Award. A seasoned women’s events speaker, she’s a popular writing teacher at conferences around the nation and the author of the beginning writer’s workbook: From the Inside-Out: discover, create and publish the novel in you!. She is also the founder of www.MyBookTherapy.com, a story-crafting service that helps authors discover their voice. Susan’s next book The Baroness comes out in 2012.
patients were regularly popping their clogs due to end stage renal
cry out to him,
Venue – The Clarion (Highlander) Hotel and Conference Center Iowa City
So now I'm trying to decide if we even need a home phone. I have unlimited texting to anyone and free Verizon phone calls. The only person I ever talk to who is non-Verizon is my MIL. I guess MILs are supposed to be aggravating like that and go totally against the grain of everyone else in your calling plan, right? Haha But she works midnights, so a lot of times we talk after 9 pm and weekends anyway, so then it would still be free for me.
I find the natural cathedral a very fitting picture for this post. :)
All right. I'll give you one more. I'm a pretty quirky person. I can't eat the end slices from a loaf of packaged bread. Yuk!
The flower head, leaves and stem of cauliflower are all eatable, but it is the immature flower head that is typically eaten. To preserve the nutritive value, it is best to consume cauliflower raw or steamed. It is suggested that cauliflower has cancer fighting properties that are progressively destroyed if it is boiled over 5 minutes.
Every day, without fail and without sacrifice to the great god of underpants, he goes to the toilet (almost completely unprompted) and evacuates his bowel (how disgusting does that sound?) completely.
Fill me with Thy love and power;
So if you are struggling, you have frequent blue times, your past is haunting you and your self esteem is on the floor, have faith...you can get better if you really work towards self love/acceptance, one beautiful baby step at a time.
said she was so happy that she wasn't a pioneer girl!!
If you haven't done it yet now is the time to create something special just for dad! I am putting together a couple different things for my husband and Dad this year. This first one is simple, easy, fun, and definitely heartfelt! Can't beat that combination!
The chippy hand painted black box is actually the top of a little old table; the opening at the top is where the drawer used to be. I got it for next to nothing because the bottom (back side) is falling apart. I think it will be perfect for holding papers after I glue it back together. I liked the rusty green paint on the small chicken feeder.
No matter what the facade looked like, I wanted to find out if these nuns had found real joy on the inside….
10. Cynical
peacekeeping failures ruffled more
The staff members were helpful in every way. They were readily available to answer questions, take photos or rescue unsuspecting visitors from sassy glasses snatchers and ear nibblers. The visit to Parrot Mountain and Gardens was the highlight of our trip.
And I understand where this comes from. The midfield has been ravaged by injuries in previous seasons with the effects felt this time around. Wilshere’s absence is compounded by that of Abou Diaby. The Frenchman is infuriating some which is the Arsenal equivalent of starting a fight in an empty room. Where no quarter is given on either side misses the point; that frustration is borne out of the knowledge that Diaby is one of the most talented midfielders that has played for the club. Or potentially was since Dan Smith’s tackle has done its worst to ensure that may never been proven.
Loved it. That place was an effing PALACE. Ugh. Beautiful. So beautiful you could puke. And did I ever, but I'll get to that in a bit.
I am proud as a peacock!
So, there you go, that’s my day. Freed the slaves and cut off separate-but-equal at the pass. Go me.
C.D: What is the saddest thing you’ve ever heard of or seen?
Since first using the term ‘radical realism’ some seven months ago, a few readers have been enthusiastic about the term, while others seemed to worry that the two words together might hide a generally heartless, and possibly even highly dictatorial, agenda. I don’t see it that way, but then I would say that. So it may be helpful if I apply it to one of the Big Issues of the day.
Late afternoon we drove to the next town over to drop off the meal and cookies. I am going to post the chicken pot pie recipe later this week. It’s my moms recipe actually. She got it from cooking light years ago and I adapted it a tiny bit. I got a text message from the girl I gave it to that said “You can cook for me anytime! That was SO good!”. Glad I could help, even in such a small way. Makes you really appreciate what you have for sure.
Their indiscretion at a Mardi Gras ball—the pinnacle event for Mobile’s elite—forces their present wants and needs to collide with sins of the past.
After the third album the band "drifted apart", only to reform to record again when their song "Nine By Nine" featuring violinist Nick Pickett was #1 in France. The 1972 album Blue, released just as John Dummer Band, featured a cover by Roger Dean, whilst the band had shrunk to a four-piece blues-rock band, comprising Dummer, Pickett, Pietryga and Thomson. The band's fifth album, Oobleedoobleejubilee (1973), released as John Dummer's Oobleedooblee Band, had a country music style, whilst the line-up again included the Kelly, along with Michael Evans (violin) and Roger Brown (vocals). The bands final album, recorded in 1973, included Graham Bond (sax), Pick Withers (drums), Pete Emery (guitar) and Colin Earl (Foghat) (keyboards), but the album was shelved, and the band broke up in 1974. This final album was eventually released in 2008, as the Lost 1973 Album.
Using kitchen twine, tie parsley and dill together leaving a short length to tie around pot handle (don’t let that string anywhere near your heat source, please!). This will make it much easier to fish all those herbs out later.
Your lives with your longings will ever keep pace.
a time to plant and a time to uproot,
A golf course?
1-2 teaspoons minced canned chipotle chiles in adobo sauce (use the lesser amount for less heat, greater amount for a bigger kick)
His tone turned conciliatory, apologetic. "Hey, I'm not arguing. Rissad was going to be sent here to finish his training, and the whole town was honoured by it. A great woman. You seem pretty good at turning out great Gifted."
My very first trip abroad was when I was 16 .. I went to stay with one of my fathers colleagues
In 1999, we bought the house at $141K.
Bike and Roll NYC is the New York branch of America’s leading bicycle rentals and tours company with six locations in the city. Bike and Roll locations nationwide are known for outstanding customer service, exceptional value, and quality rental equipment with additional locations in Chicago, Miami Beach, Washington DC, and San Francisco. For more information, visit www.bikeandroll.com
Given the small number of high-level positions currently held by either women, or persons of color in City government, it is imperative that we not only work to maintain those positions, but also work towards taking corrective action to increase diversity throughout your administration.
Log in at 2:30 A.M. KST at the specific date and you’ll get 20 coins and an AP reset scroll GUARANTEED. Then, you might also get some of the new profession skill equipment (the level 125 ones) or even this badge, Legend’s Hero Badge!
This is crazy.
Because leaving just upsets me
“Not that long,” Brodie answered, hauling himself upright as he unzipped his parka and let it slide off his shoulders and onto the floor. “Need to get it skinned and soaking.”
My whole life I’ve had an intense fear of failure. I stayed in my comfort zone and unfortunately accomplished some really great things. I say unfortunately because I never gave myself the chance to grow. When confronted with any sort of challenge, I simply turned the corner and tried my hand at something else. I became an expert at skimming surfaces.
Yeah, you digital distribution fan boys can keep praising this so called ‘future of entertainment,’ while your Gods laugh all the way to the bank with your retirement money. Putting all your eggs in the digital distribution basket is foolish, and you know what they say about a fool and his money.
This is all gathering data. These mentioned public servants and military are trained not just to gather information but to recall it for the purpose of reporting the events as they happened. This Data is what I draw upon in likening it to the Data a camera receives.
40 minutes of strength training with Biceps focus:
April, 2012 edition of Leadership Development Carnival, hosted by Shri Tanmay Vora has also not missed the perennial feature of any major discussions on leadership development – CHANGE.
Experiencing solitude, ideally in nature, is a wonderful way to rest attention capacities, and reflect on life. Stephen and Rachel Kaplan (1989), faculty at the University of Michigan, explain the importance of attention restoration that time in nature provides. They describe how the resting of voluntary, or directed attention (attention that requires effort to stay focused) is possible when we are in natural environments that offer “soft fascination” such as bird songs, waterfalls, views of sunsets and the sound of leaves rustling in the wind. Environments that offer soft fascination allow directed attention to rest, and involuntary attention to become active. Involuntary attention does not require effort. This relaxing of the mind can have many psychological benefits, and provides opportunities for reflection.
Mon.
So for all of you wanting to keep up with us and our journey to "our new normal" just click on the new link below:
1. Read/Listen to 12 books.
Several months ago leaves sprouted on the trees in New England announcing that spring had come and summer is just around the corner. What are the “sprouted leaves”, signs that the kingdom of God is near (see Luke 21:10-28)? When will these events happen (see verse 32)?
Enjoy with rice topped sesame oil and potato roast..
Oh, and thanks you guys for reading my pulp non-fiction drivel. I hope to write much more (which may or may not be a resolution, I can't say) in the future.
The “What happens next?” syndrome is common with seat of the pants writing. Often writing oneself out of a corner can cause a plot or personality mismatch in the back pages.
I have used one of my all time favourite Bugaboo images to make my card - as I wanted something lighthearted and a little fun for her. We all know how rough the first few weeks can feel, so I figured a little smile through her door would be the best way to go.. :0)
Then we will past the torch to the children, grandchildren and them to theirs.
I turned back to Charity to excuse myself
Brewery Beer
If you stick around in this business long enough, you see pretty much everything. And then there’s days when you think you’ve seen it all and this happens.
kept shouting
If I remember correctly, it was the Intute Board who took the decision to continue to concentrate mainly on an Internet resource catalogue, and from this point onwards, Intute was doomed to a slow death, even though further £ millions went into funding it.
Today Kimberly posted her first challenge for 2012 - in honor of the coming CHA trade show she asks to create a project using items that start with "C", "H" and "A".
Note: I had a lot of amazing help on this list from Andreas from Pussy Goes Grrr. She was kind enough to make a post for me in which she brought together five ‘obscure-ish’ films from each year that were recommendations from her to everyone. Luckily I had only seen a little over 10 of them. Her picks were a wonderful combination of films that were either on my brainstorm list (that she had seen and recommended them provided further incentive to see them) or were films I had not heard of and was delighted to come across. http://pussygoesgrrr.com/2012/04/10/obscure-ish-movies-of-the-1940s/
"We never pollute our bodies with coffee unless our church owns the company. Do you have any tomato juice?"
Alas, that they should wear our colors there,
I’m certain in a couple weeks time, that’ll change. I might do it to get used to it… We’ll see…
and not the truth
Battleships or fakes. Shoot, they're shooting at one another with gold and red and smoke and the gold moon hangs low over a cityscape and WHAT are these flying flames?? Bird Kites!!! Glow gold red and stream green flying flaming over crowds and water. Phoenix. Phoenixes? Pheoni? The gold moon climbs higher slightly and stays large. A globe. Lazers? Do you see those lazers in the smoke? On the building! Oh! Light show!
Other times, they want to see what the latest song is that’s been on my mind. Even though they are often sad songs (see below), there’s always that cute picture of me to cheer you right back up. That’s the power of dog.
I have loved being his mom more than ink on paper could ever describe.
Both ships survived the first half of the hurricane by running their engines at full power to help the anchors keep them in place. When the eye reached them, both captains decided to make a break for it, the Rhone’s captain opting for deep water, which is, counterintuitively, a safer place to be during a storm. Because the Rhone was deemed the worthier craft, all passengers from the Conway were transferred to her and tied in their bunks, as was the practice at the time during storm conditions.
you have the freedom to become an air-base.”
I was up late. SH went to bed early for him, but only because he had stayed up the entire night before working. He went to bed at 8:30 a.m. on Tuesday and got up at 11:00 a.m. on Tuesday and was a bit cranky during the day, as you might imagine. He was actually ready to go to bed at 11:00 p.m. after he hit "send" at 10:46 p.m.
higher end advertisers
First one, I love because the title is PERFECT for the filmstrip. And I love my little makeshift sunshine. The circle on the sun is from a MDS download called Sweet Details. AND I love the font I found to use. It is called Smitten Kitten - from a free font site. Want it? Google it!
screenshot at 909pm CDT 5/2/2012:
So back to the pondering....
1. Dacquoise biscuit
On the problems with tobacco display bans and plain packaging is that they are rooted in the idea that the very sight of a product constitutes advertising. This is very questionable logic, but it allows campaigners to demand that all tobacco branding be hidden from view.
P.s it’s even better the second time!
You scare me because after months of exposure, I know nothing about you.
Chills run through my hope and I look down to see my breath.
Yet, if one reads Finnegans Wake and pays attention (not easy) images spring to mind with reckless abandon, but not always the same ones. I seem to remember that a ‘fargobawler’ is a cargo-hauler, but as for the other two…
Poly–
Valcke said the country was more than ready to welcome the world for the soccer spectacle.
*Twice-Baked Potatoes
Two quotes that go perfectly with these stories -
could be the brick dust
2 leadership
In a field
In light of the grand mud slide (Oh I know it's nothing compared to what you have in California and other places, but a pain in the butt for me) all decluttering and most housework will come to a halt so that I can deal with this mess.
He walked past Kadie’s graduation picture to the rose-draped coffin. His bent shoulders acknowledging the burden he carried. His face was moist with un-wiped tears. He was a young man aged in an instant. He reached out and touched the coffin. It was obvious in his mind he was touching her face.
Thank goodness I took my camera with me on Tuesday and managed to take a few photos!
According to Confused.com’s research, British drivers have some odd, and unsafe, habits. Forty percent of women drive in heels, while 24% of women and 22% of men have driven with bare feet. (And 46% of drivers eat while driving.) Not everyone even gets dressed before they get behind the wheel: 25% have driven while wearing their pyjamas.
Here's what greet's you at our front door...I got this basket with my Mom last spring at a little shop in Homewood called Four Seasons Antiques, Art and Botanicals...its such a cute shop and has things at a decent price. We got the hydrangeas there as well, we like to pay a little more for more realistic looking flowers but were able to pick up the fern and other greenery from one of my favorite stores, Hobby Lobby! Mom, it looks great, thanks for helping me with it!
Now comes word that another compound has been found in wine that blocks immature fat cells' ability to develop and grow.
“A joint statement issued a few years ago by the Pontifical Council for Culture and well as the Pontifical Council for Interreligious Dialogue quotes the Holy Father, who warns with regard to the ‘return of ancient Gnostic ideas under the guise of the so-called New Age: We cannot delude ourselves that this will lead toward a renewal of religion. It is only a new way of practicing Gnosticism – that attitude of the spirit that, in the name of a profound knowledge of God, results in distorting His Word and replacing it with purely human words’.”
Friday, March 30 - Emily wanted to make cookies to share with her friends on the camping trip. She's putting the sprinkles on the cookies before we pack them up. The second picture is our picture of our finished paintings from Painting with a Twist - so much fun!
IV. Reflections on Slavery and the Constitution (Lexington Books, 2012)
Sort of a blend of southern soul food and the flavors of Hawaii. I had a straight up southern dish that I can't believe I found here: shrimp and cheese grits. It was most awesome. Super creamy and TONS of shrimp. It had this fancy stream of black strap molasses going back and forth over the top. 7yo had fried chicken and cornbread a la carte, and both were the best fried chicken and cornbread that I've yet had in Hawaii. N now tells me I need to make my cornbread like THAT and not like the dry crap I make. Well, I try. Both the cornbread and the chicken (oddly to me) come with a side of honey butter.
Don’t look here for the answer (or even the question). Instead, we get uncritical regurgitation of advertising copy.
It drives!
Miss 10, who hasn't quite put in enough training hours this year, sprinted into 3rd place beaten by her nemisis. Hmm, not sure how this will go over, I fear her foot injury may provide an excuse for why she couldn't defend her title. She is off to Regionals to represent the school in a few weeks.
(July 25, 2010)
We realize that giving more money to the corrupt leaders of Enron so it could try to “fix its problems” and save some jobs would have made no sense. Those corrupt leaders would have blown that money on themselves.
It is a classic Nativity scene. Perhaps we are inured to its theme
One day we met Aunt Joyce at the local pizza diner, and had a great lunch. We also went and visited Aunt Joyce at home and played with her and her puppies. The girls were super excited to playing with Joyce and getting to know her.
In his horoscope, you’ll note that Rep. Cantor was born under a YOD pattern indicating a special task, crisis, or turning point when childish tantrums just won’t do. Sun, Jupiter, and Neptune are involved in the YOD pattern.
Gulmarg
Anyone involved in that sort of behviour does not deserve to be in the BNP, let alone to lead the BNP.
We finally finished cleaning out Kiel’s bedroom (thanks Bella!) and he is just thrilled! I’m trying not to feel too guilty that it took so long, considering his excitement level. Even Noah was impressed and I’ve had to explain more than a few times why the room can’t be his and why it IS fair that Kiel gets it. (This is what Noah’s bedroom looked like when he was three. Someday I should do a blog post about what it looks like five plus years and a few dozen rages later. It isn’t pretty.)
am choking in this sorrow.
I was taken aback by this. Here I am, suffering a minor injury that'll take a day or two to heal. An injury I sustained whilst on someone else's property and they wont accept any responsibility for it.
I found it to be an interesting read, however it just seemed rather one sided in it’s views and I struggle to see how it fits within the pages of this, otherwise outstanding, Bar Magazine.
I try to explain but words can’t be found
3 differences
The challenge this week is:-
Paper - Wicked Fun, basic black cajun craze, rich razzleberry, old olive, whisper white card stock
My suit
And, I can’t help but think I’m glad it did. For while life was happening, I was tucking the details away so later I could use them in a world of my own creation.
Natalie Imbruglia Smoke AUS
So, for my class on Dystopian Fiction that I am teaching this summer, I read Brave New Love, an anthology of short stories edited by Paula Guran. There are thirteen stories in the collection, and all are set in different dystopian worlds. The common element, as the title indicates, is romance, and it comes in all shapes and sizes here. Apparently there were some issues with this book being published because some of the relationships are same sex, and the book is for teens, but I didn’t see anything I would label inappropriate. I suppose even when the world is falling apart, people still won’t be able to love who they want to.
“You? Shy?” he asked.
We were ushered in. Pam, the head of the Oncology unit at the hospital, was there to take notes as usual, because what the oncologist says affects the treatment at Oncology.
In the next verse, Hebrews 10:26, it tells us that it is a sin to willfully forsake the assembling of ourselves together. Church attendance is mandatory every week, not just when we feel we should honor God with our presence. How sanctimonious can we get? We stand in awe of His presence, not He of ours. It’s at His table that we partake of our sacrifice for sin, and if we “draw back,” meaning to shun, to withdraw, or to shrink away from His table, verse 26 says, “there remains no more sacrifice for sin.” Verse 27 & 28 let us know that we can look forward to a certain and fearful judgment, and are worthy of death.
Facebook Mobile illustration courtesy of Kelsey Dake. Photos courtesy of National Geographic.
1 clove garlic, peeled
and graced our property
Apart from longer trade timings (7 am to 7 pm), better infrastructure has contributed to the increase in the trade volume. At present, India is primarily exporting tomato and soyabean to Pakistan via the Attari-Wagah land route while the import list comprises cement, coal, gypsum, dry fruit, dates, soda ash and chemicals. In the import list, cement and coal are the new additions.
"Tired" goes away........
Wednesday October 3
Slowing peeling each one
Take David Murphy. After rotting in the reserves under McLeish, he was restored to the first team largely by default (i.e. we didn’t have anyone else) by Hughton and stepped up.
Alcoholic drinks are currently banned at Brazilian stadiums and the country's health minister has urged Congress to maintain the ban in the new law.
that is cute..
I know my taste in fabric is not everyone's taste and that's OK. If no one buys them Gilly will be the best dressed horse around, he doesn't complain about color or design, he just wants them to feel good on his back.
He spoke of the oneness of humanity. He said he was no different from the 7 billion other humans in the world. He urged us to take care of each other. If I take care of the world, I take care of myself.
For Information on the Technology Showcase, call Lockheed Martin Specialty Components, Customer Service at 813-541-8700 or 1-800-541-8701.
any implementation plan for a policy permitting homosexuals to serve
INORI’S MAGICAL FUCKING CRYSTAL FLOWER INEXPLICABLY MADE FROM HER MAGICAL FUCKING TEARS FUCKING STARTS TO GLOW JUST AS SHU IS ABOUT TO FUCKING DIE
Taylor enjoyed learning about the toilet,
The survivals left. A diminished troop. The official report stated that the expedition had been unsuccessful due to insurmountably difficult working conditions. The Cardinal was listed among those lost.
"In many places it is literally not safe physically for youngsters to go to school. And in many
First I need to cut some circles. Two discs of 10mm thick MDF with a series of holes to retain the bearings. Bought radius plates often just have a ring of ball bearings, spring loaded to keep them on centre. Because my discs will only be 2mm thick I want a bit more support than that. And I have got a LOT of bearings, so let’s not be tight. So the first job is to make a circle cutting jig for the band saw. Just something functional for now, I’ll polish it later.
Another well kept secret in my family.
Walt – Yes Bob that is the analogy, you use your driver, wedge and putter on most holes but sometimes you need that 64 degree lob wedge and in commercial real estate that might be auction services or we have an asset recovery team for our lender clients to help them make decisions regarding their assets, if someone has a special needs like property management,hospitality, receivership or sale-leaseback we also have the ability to help them with those selections if needed.
Dishonest bits of propaganda, like the recent BBC series “Prisoner's wives” may portray a human trafficer as a white man from Essex called Steve, or make the only honourable male character in the entire series a black man loyally serving time in prison for crimes really committed by his ginger haired white girlfriend, but that is fantasyland liberal froth and not the reality of new Britain.
Place blame on others,
1 fieldhurst--or
Two students broke out of their reading of the essays to lean over, point to a word on the page, and ask me, “How do you say this word?” I told them, they straightened up, and clearly, confidently, they finished reading the essays.
What I didn't tell you was the insurance mess that followed. I didn't receive a Cobra notice in a timely fashion, but what can you do when it's the federal government? Nothing.
What a great day at Chorley watching FC United win 2 0 to reach the Northern Premier League play-off final. A few pints, reds everywhere, the atmosphere created by the FC fans was immense. It was like watching United play City at Maine Road in the '70s and '80s.
The sun is going down like a ball of fire. Dusk moves
She leaves and is still bored. She comes home.
Take pleasure in it, enjoy meal time & savor it. Planning and preparing meals builds anticipation and appreciation! Branch out from the salt and pepper shaker and try new flavours and spices to add excitement and satisfaction.
I have edited it in PicMonkey using the Daguerreotype Frame – which did take away from the second subject (the church itself) but I really liked the effect.
Today’s a big day for C.A.T. … its second e-book is published today… Neptune’s Angel… and what an adventure it has been.
We had such a good time. We looked at all the pictures, chatted, sat on this sofa and that chair. My father took photos of us.
Holika Holika is a fairly new brand to me, it’s first store just opened in Singapore a couple of weeks ago. I’ve had other Holika items CPed for me previously, but I wanted to check out the store for myself. I came away with the new Midnight Owl blush, which follows the success of the previous cat range. I was also persuaded by my friend to pick up the Face 2 Change Cream Starter and Face 2 Change Liquid Roller BB which came in a set. I somehow also ended up coming home with the Enamel Magic Melodramatic Mascara Set. lol… totally random hauling going on..
1.burning star
O.k., enough of my temperature tirade! I'm also very torn about the fact that it is vacation and I want to spend time with the kiddos, but I have A TON OF STUFF TO DO!!!!! I currently have 3 laundry baskets of folded laundry (only folded because my Mom folded it while I was doing my shopping this morning. Thanks, Mom!) in my living room, two loads on my bed that need attention, And that is just the tip of the iceberg. You see, next Tuesday I'm having laproscopy. I hadn't wanted to mention it here, but the last few months I have been suffering some very intense with my menses. The doctor suspects endometriosis, but the only way to be sure is to have laproscopy. I'm not sure how I'm going to feel afterwards. As it stands now, I'm about 2 weeks behind due to traveling over to N.H. to see my doctor and the last time I was in pain for an entire week, unable to do much at all. This is totally cramping my garden plans. (No pun intended!)
Dressing Up With Michael Kors Watches
An infant crying in the night:
Owen has difficulty separating the economics from the politics. He doesn’t see public spending cuts as an economic problem; he sees them as a way to wage political war on anyone who doesn’t agree with his view that Labour should be a haven for the anti-Tory vote. In part, he is right – we are the alternative – but we desperately need to pick up Tory voters too. We need to be pro-Labour, not just anti-Tory.
REAL-f's unique production technology makes sure that even details like the iris and blood vessels are replicated accurately. REAL-f 3D face replica costs US$3,920 with additional copies US $780 each , while the head replica costs US $5,875 with additional copies US $1,960.
In regard to diet, I’ve been attempting to make better choices, drink more water, and drink at least one shake a day. There have been entire weeks where I don’t have a single shake, but I’m sticking to it nonetheless. After both the 5k and beach trip were over, Nathan became inspired by my health-kick and joined the gym himself… complete with a big ol’ man jug of whey protein on my kitchen counter. Another change is that I’ve started shopping locally – whether at our local SC grocer (Piggly Wiggly) or the SC Farmers Market – for meat, eggs, fruit, veggies and dairy. Don’t worry, Aldi is still my favorite little nugget of a store but it’s more for the things that are crap no matter where you buy them, like crackers and chips and frozen waffles. We can’t be totally perfect.
show details 12/11/09
Too bad I took my first grammar class the next semester and received a D- on the PRE-TEST on the first day of class. Seems that I didn’t really learn too much grammar in high school like I thought. Hell, I thought I was going to be the best English teacher in the world..or West Virginia…I went into a mini-tailspin, and then dropped my English major to a minor and changed my major to Speech Communications and Drama. Yeah, that major hooks a job right after graduation. Not a bright move. But, I was a little bummed that Miss English here didn’t know shit about English.
Tip:
Bureaucratic BS if you ask me, yet they allow people in the country by the boatload who CANNOT even speak English! Where is the justification in that?
Zucca e Cannella (Pumpkin and Cinnamon)
And it feels soooo good when you're done.
We just had one of our rogue scrap men come round again, cruising the streets like Prince Albert in his Hansom carriage trying to satiate his taste for Victorian prostitutes, but this lot differentiate themselves by broadcasting, to all and sundry, the Peter Sellers version of Any Old Iron on a constant loop only interrupting the lyrics with an unintelligible demand for “washers, driers, cookers, fridge freezers, microwaves, and TVs”.
I'm all, hmmm...that doesn't sound right. So, I said, "Um...to his face?" And she sobbed, breaking down, "No, but I THOUGHT IT!!!"
Interesting articles to read:
The protesters have spent most of their time in the plaza, sleeping on air mattresses, holding assemblies to discuss their goals and listening to speakers including filmmaker Michael Moore and Princeton University professor Cornel West.
as the young man gently ran a finger across his newborn baby's brow........
2. SEVERAL times, too often to be a coincidence….we see severe weather (tornadoes , damaging winds, and hail) hit these frequency flash epicenters. This usually occurs within 48 hours of the high frequency being emitted from the ground based station (usually a ground based NEXRAD RADAR or similar).
Even if we were able to spare enough to give something to one family, what about the next … and the one after that …?
I pray that this little home becomes a light.
6. Diane Ackerman "A Natural History of the Senses"
#6 Which is more blessed, loving someone or being loved by someone?
I'll be making other traditional Bavarian dishes, like red cabbage (my husband and older brother loves this), and my son's request is homemade spaetzle. We spend our Christmas Eve, honoring the memory of our Mutti. My brother's play music, we sing Christmas Carols and we open our gifts-- in true European Christmas style. You know, I'm fine with that. Because I'm working all the way until December 23rd, and I'm thankful that I can prepare a meal that is far less work than a Prime Rib Dinner.
Miz Gould Keil also reported the board had additional concerns about where the sheikh's money came from—!!—as well as his diplomatic immunity, which means he can't be held legally accountable for anything that might happen on the premises.
Most people probably wouldn’t realise the airline has been running since 1949, making it a strong heritage airline in Asia, not many airlines having the same age and experience behind them. Now joining SkyTeam in early 2013 they have strengthened their position offering a vital link in South East Asia and across the pacific.
Concerning Christology within church history, Gerald Bray presents an even handed description and explanation of the churches formation and articulation of the doctrine of the deity of Christ. Bray’s discussion is a dose of good medicine for those who want to cast doubt on whether the early church fathers ‘invented’ the deity of Christ. Bray rightly points out that their debates were not hinged on questioning the deity of Christ but rather they assumed and affirmed the deity of Christ. “The issues debated during the decades of classical creedal formation were more about how belief in his deity should be expressed and harmonized with monotheism then whether he was divine at all (p. 169).” Concerning the correlation between the churches formation and development of the doctrine of the deity of Christ Wellum’s words are worth quoting at length:
At the end of the book there is a Busy Moms Ft Loss Companion. The guide has great resources like; exercise descriptions, goal setting worksheet, fitness journal and pre-made grocery lists. The author has really considered any obstacles that new moms might face and found ways to overcome the difficulties.
Some discoveries amaze me like just yesterday I found out that my hair can amazingly pretty if brushed in a certain way ( I am a girl whose most days are bad hair days).Some time finding something about yourself is quite disappointing like the other day I realised that I do get scared when a stray dog growls at me( I used to believe that dogs no matter how big or small do not scare me)..but overall its fun discovering things.Its like you are on the journey that you do frequently but an unexpected surprise might come up on the next turn
In order to calculate, in a very simple way, the healthy weight of a person, we detract 100 from the person’s height measured in centimeters. For example, if a person is 160cm of height, the weight of that person must be no more than 60kg.
Emily sighed, happily eating her pancakes. “They call him my daddy.”
their love surpasses this evil feat.
Nishijo M, Nakagawa H, Honda R, Tanebe K, Saito S, Teranishi H, Tawara K. Effects of maternal exposure to cadmium on pregnancy outcome and breast milk. Occup Environ Med 2002; 59: 394-397.
The reason why concealed traveler surveillance cameras are getting to be so well liked is simply because excel at hooking men and women undertaking factors they really should not be undertaking. There isn’t a other manner in which is really impressive in the courtroom court proceeding specially as proof or as a online video media file with the took place.
1/2 tsp. baking soda
*Bobbie is, we hope, going to be born at home. That wasn't the original plan -- our midwife delivers at a hospital, but she started attending home births sooner than she'd planned. I am really, really happy/relieved with this change. I adore our midwife and initially made the choice to stay with her rather than pursue a home birth, but just as I was starting to feel some anxiety about delivering in a hospital, I discovered that home birth was an option. (My sister and I were both born at home so it feels like a logical/natural choice to me.)
Have you received your copy yet of Romantic Prairie Style? my copy arrived earlier than scheduled. I am a happy girl.
The Mass Effect series displays these traits right up until the very ending. Once the star child emerges into the narrative, however, all of this is completely thrown out of the window and the creators thrust us into The Epic of Gilgamesh. Moral agency, free will, and humanism are all eschewed in favor of a heavy-handed preachy and ultimately unsatisfying ending. It's similar to my complaints regarding Dan Simmons' Hyperion Cantos.
and in the underground
So, Eli got pink eye. Bummer. I get a call today around 3 telling me that I have to pick him up at daycare. Oh well. I tried to get a shot of it, but honestly it isn't that bad and I couldn't manage to get Eli to look at the camera long enough to grab a shot of it. So, here's my effort to show you all. Fail.
The term vegetarian was coined in 1847 by the founders of the Vegetarian Society of Great Britain, although vegetarianism as a way of life has existed for thousands of years. The founders of the Vegetarian Society were lacto-ovo vegetarians.
There actually are some free applications that I would recommend.
That this is not, this is not our home
We used to have egg and bacon flan, no such thing as a quiches which to my mind is just the French name for a traditional English dish. Monica’s crisp short crust pastry base, a filling of bacon and beaten eggs, seasoned well with salt and pepper… It didn’t seem to matter how salty food naturally was, it was always well-seasoned when cooked and there was a salt cellar on the table to be spooned into a tiny pile on the edge of your plate.
Row 1- attach w/CC to top of back piece w/ sl st. ch1, sc in sm sp and each sc across (15)
Ed reformers like Bush havent learned that test scores are so limited, as evidenced by his successful efforts earlier this year to make FCAT more difficult. Supposed to be the solution to “failing schools,” test scores don’t translate to results that are actually important like college readiness for individual students. Such a reality delivers a blow to ed reformers narrative. The haste to implement suppressive testing regimes based on a “failing schools” meme has produced students who may score well on multiple-choice tests, but aren’t ready to succeed in college.
Psycho is such a well known movie that most people, even those who haven’t seen the film, know it almost beat for beat. However, there was a time when people were still surprised. And I was one of those people. I saw this movie as a kid and didn’t know much about it, other than the look of the house and motel. Most people pick the shower scene (and it is a classic) but I’m going with the actual reveal of ‘mother’.
I am obsessed with keeping my house clean. And not just spic and span clean, I mean sterilized clean. Every day I map our floor with a mixture of Domex, water, and Zonrox. The solution smells so clean and it keeps ants and cockroaches away. In 4 litres of water, I put about 2 capfulls of Domex and 2 capfulls of Zonrox. I use 2 cups of the solution, and add 2 teaspoons of baking soda to clean the walls, furniture, doorknobs, kitchen and bathroom sink, and even my kids’ toys. The rest I use to mop the floor. Doing this everyday is quite costly but my kids are not getting sick anymore and the security I feel knowing that my family is safe, is truly priceless! Some may argue that these cleaners are toxic but for me, it is the best cleaning solution. However, I am thinking of switching to using more baking soda and less chemical agents to clean my house. After all, a box costs only 15pesos and it certainly does go a long way.
Then I climbed up onto the roof.
And lots of agents are obviously hard at work during this month as some fulls we've requested have gotten offers of representation--literally only days after receiving the actual manuscript.
Congratulations to ALL! Tea Time Terrific Top Three and Winner, please grab your badges from our sidebar that you can proudly display on your blogs! Winner, please contact me via e-mail to claim your prize!
It takes a particular type of skill to fulfil this role, and it is not one I seek for myself. Clive, however, does have the necessary experience, and is ready to use it to assist parties in minimising delay and expense.
a little more
Yesterday, the USPTO released a Federal Register Notice titled "Changes to Representation of Others Before the United States Patent and Trademark Office," which updates the 2003 draft that tried to define the allowable scope of representation for patent agents and attorneys.
!!! Methinks we already are! HA!
The color should be in fact the first thought of any gardener: even if the design is pretty basic, depending on the room you have to spend for your flower garden, the color goes by the name of the flower garden. The color is like a person’s eyes are drawn to your flower garden, be sure and get the most enjoyment from your garden of flowers, if the colors are proper located. I’ve always had a lot of satisfaction from my flower garden during the many years. I have been tending and planning and changing.
I won't even talk about my garden as so far it is nothing but mud and swamp in the yard.
Here comes another WTF?! I knew I didn't do that much work. It's been so hard to focus on work when my mind is elsewhere. I have no motivation right now. I came back to work before I was ready because we couldn't afford for me to take unpaid time off. However, I admitted it and apologized for it. It was also my first fucking 3 days back. Seriously, how about you let me settle in before you start scolding me? Once I admit it and tell you my reason why, is it really necessary to continue to tell me why you don't care and that I need to get more work done since I'm getting paid? The thing is, she made it sound like I wasn't doing any work, though I was. I just wasn't doing as much work as she thought I was should be. Any person with a heart would give me time to settle in, but no, I have to be at 100% productivity from day 1. I think it's worth mentioning to me if it becomes an ongoing problem but was it really necessary to mention it to me after my first 3 days back after I had a miscarriage? I feel it's important to point out that she is super workaholic chick. She's the person that only takes her lunch at work and is on the computer working while eating. She also comes in on weekends. I feel like she expects much more from me than my position requires. She expects me to do the amount of work she does when I'm 4 years younger in a temporary positions vs. her permanent full time employee position. I'm all for doing the work I'm getting paid for but I'm not about to use my lunch breaks to get more work done than necessary when I’m in a non-career position.
Disclosure: This blog is informational and is not a recommendation to buy or sell anything. If you are thinking about investing consider the risk. Everyone’s financial situation is different. Consult your financial advisor.
Last, to help motivate Charlie, I gave him a mini notebook where he could earn 3 stickers during each "session." He could earn them for: using his best handwriting, reading his very best, and overall always doing his best. We then set goals: when he earned 15 stickers he could go get a special treat and when he earned those stickers we set another goal. Positive reinforcement is SO important when helping a child learn and be successful.
The mainstream media is as confused as anyone. They have no idea how to portray this nascent movement. Without clear soundbites on specific positions, the press is unable to use their dismissive stock and trade, that being writing a story that’s little more than competing soundbites. Lacking a clear position from the protesters, they are unable to find someone to quote saying the exact opposite and call it journalism. So, more often than not, they’ve just ignored the whole affair. It doesn’t fit neatly into the socio-political dynamic they’re comfortable with and earn their livings on, so they have no idea how to cover it.
1 x PTX018 / F / air = 24.00 (No Stock)
2 ten ounce bags frozen broccoli cuts (use fresh if you want…probably 2-3 small bunches)
Next: The Maladaptive Ways We Cope With Stress
Honestly, my lips have never felt so good. The next day they are smooth and soft and lip products go on better and last much longer. I use it every other night (mainly because I forget to do it everyday) but you will need to do this as part of your routine. Results don’t last for days (in my case) so you would definitly need to keep it up. Unless you have great lips. Then you won’t need this. And I will hate you.
I took some goodies to an unsuspecting friend--and to be clear, that balloon took up her entire front door. One of my prouder moments--seriously.
But all in all, it was a fabulous experience. There will probably never be anything like the first time, but I'm hoping to add some more terrific memories as I steadily decrease my times. And who knows . . . .maybe a half-Ironman before I'm 40??
it was obvious
Um, problem is, an orphan and an orphan ministry usually doesn't have that kind of cash laying around. And so, we all began to pray and God began to answer those prayers...
Recently, our band’s business manager, Jonathan, shared a shocking story with us. His childhood friend had passed away from a heart attack at the young age of 42. At the funeral, Jonathan and his friends were talking about their mutual friend’s passing, and decided to all get their hearts checked.
This system has been a flawless one - up until Monday morning, when I couldn't find the 997 binder for the life of me. Dun dun dun! Now that I hate my other two binders (which are just ridiculous awful and there's no way I'd even try to wear one of them longer than 4 hours. I'm most likely going to donate them to a local trans dude who they may work for & fit better or to the Big Brothers Used Binder Program), I opted to just go to school to the loose-binding M801 and to just strategically wear my jacket all day to hide my chest.
What exactly does this pertain to?
1 keeper's
It'd be like the Greek myths, reenacted through 21st century technology. The divine encounter: install six of these in St. Peter's.
“It’s like X-Men meets the circus…” is the best description so far. It’s got tons of action and adventure, a little romance, and (I hope) plenty of humor.
Rising from the ashes of Southside Richmond teen outfit the L'Sabres, a new band clad in black, faces covered in white corpse paint, made their mark on the city's burgeoning rock scene in the mid 60's. The Deadbeats stayed true to their garage roots, but took things in a decidedly more soulful direction. In '66 the lads hit the notoriously low-fi Richmond Sound Stages at 2314 W. Cary Street to bang out their first record, self-released on the Greenedeem label. The top side, "Movin' Out", is a fairly typical blue-eyed take on the Stax/Volt sound of the day, owing more than a passing nod to Wilson Pickett's "In The Midnight Hour". The flip, "Hearsin' Around" is a sleazy instrumental just right for midnight creepin', named for the morbid ride The Deadbeats drove to gigs.
Violet is thought to provoke harmony of the mind and emotions. It is also thought to encourage creativity, unique and individual.
and was planning to go with Yolanda to the temple
I have added a new page On My Cookbook Shelf, sharing the food & cookery books I love, and why. It was a tweet from the lovely Millie Mirepoix asking about cookbook recommendations that got me thinking. All day, when I should have been thinking about spreadsheets & Trust accounts..........mmmmmm.
which of my Bam Pop papers would really
It's a well-known fact that all sodium is removed from road food.
SEC WEST
This is a treat for fans of Dexter and The Silence Of The Lambs. It has echoes of both of these excellent serial killer tales while retaining its own individuality. As well as Jasper and Billy there are some fantastic supporting characters. Connie, Jasper’s feisty girlfriend is a force to be reckoned with as she attempts to keep the troubled young man on the straight and narrow. Haemophiliac best friend Howie also contributes greatly to the tale and then there’s crazy Grandma Dent to contend with.
#105 karabekianesque
Tara threw the dresses she had down, whirled away and stomped off. Tears already flowing down her face, her heart dislocating itself from where it should be. Behind her she heard her sister cry out, “Tar, wait, don’t go, this was a mistake! Let me explain!”
‘Terrible as an army with banners’,
Image: The Crafty Pad - Roshell Friends with Basket
or has the time beyond your mind confined this malady?
Sent c/o Los Angles Dodgers
thank you, friend
Don't you agree that they are too stinkin cute!
It sounds ridiculous on its face: Young children ticketed at school for disrupting class, marking on a wall with pencil, using a cuss word, scuffling on school grounds, and misbehaving on a school bus.
It is sure that the upcoming Del Ponae's book will reveal many more hideous crimes perpetrated by the K.L.A terrorists, who like to call themselves freedom fighters. The truth will come out, and hopefully, these animals will pay for their inhumane attrocities committed against the innocent Serbian people during the war in 1999.
candy, cookie in the jars. It made me feel like I was in a street of Italy. Oh god,..I want to visit Italy…for free…eat for free too (call me greedy) Tourists helped themselves with an espresso. The co-owner Connie said they’ve opened for close to 10 months. I did not ask no further if they’re financially okay (i’m hope they’re). I only came to enjoy my time. Go visit them if you’re reading this!!
The tensions between the states and the central government have always been part of the life of the nation and the Civil War was the ultimate test of whether states can secede from the Union if they feel their rights are being trampled upon. Under the many progressive social justice programs instituted since the 1930s, federal programs have acquired the power to coerce states to do its bidding simply by threatening to withhold billions in funding.
3 contact
So, you other makers of stuff out there, please don't think Alex and I are any different than you. Your mistakes and frustrations are ours. And, I am guessing that somewhere in New England, even Martha Stewart has balled up the gardener's apron she's been sewing and has thrown it in the corner of her tastefully appointed room. Because it's not always a good thing. The good thing is pressing on and mastering that project in the end.
“I know what my introduction is,” Jenna reveals to DWM, “and I have a general idea of where we’re going to go. There’s definitely a story arc. It sounds really interesting, really exciting. I don’t think anything’s been done like it before, but there are lots of secrets and intrigue, and I think it’s going to throw and confuse a lot of people, and surprise a lot of people...”
As it's nearing Valentine's day I've opted to make a romantic card using one of my favourite sentiment stamps and punched hearts - lots of them. So once you’ve checked it out, do pop over to Handy Hippo and browse the packed cyber shelves.
Here is my only warning and piece of advice for those who take the ride. If you are going to spend any time in the open car – be sure to have your glasses or sunglasses on to protect yourself from the cinders, or ashes that will be in the air. Without glasses, you will not be able to enjoy the ride in the open car – you will be too busy wiping the specs of “grit” from your eyes. I passes this advice on to my friend who heeded my warning and was prepared when she took the ride.
How can I teach without “dialogue”?
"Down with white political parties, down. Down with those who vote for white political parties, down."
Sunnies: Prada inspired
- 1 cup of plain flour
“Your spelling hasn’t improved.”
But the tradition of kissing under the mistletoe first appears in the Norse myth of Baldur the Beautiful.
I actually felt comfort and peace knowing that we are in His arms of Protection.
ABOUT iloveRobots
It is common for disreputable publishers to try to profit from aspiring writers by steering them to their own for-pay editorial, marketing, and publishing services. The implication is that by paying for those services, the writer is more likely to sell his manuscript to the publisher. Harlequin recommends the "eHarlequin Manuscript Critique Service" in the text of its manuscript submission guidelines for all of its imprints and include a link to "Harlequin Horizons," its new self-publishing arm, without any indication that these are advertisements.
Meanwhile Lanna, followed by Bantum, was making her way forward into the pitch-blackness hoping against hope that Ben was still alive.
Bottle sales at the Gasthaus Pub. For every bottle of Omission Pale Ale and Omission Lager sold in the Gasthaus, $.50 will be donated. In addition, the Gasthaus will be featuring its new gluten-free menu all month.
On a too hot Saturday in late March, my son spotted something moving stealthily just off a trail in Usery Mountain Park and said, "Look, it's...", and a friend and I suddenly became like two giddy tourists astounded at their good luck in finding a celebrity while visitng that celebrity's native city. We oohed and ahhed, exclaimed in delight, congratulated each other on our good fortune, and clicked our cameras just two feet or so from the notorious individual's face. Said individual was not pleased with our attention. He attempted to slink beneath a bush. When that only had us bending over him, he demanded we keep our distance with an all too famous signal, a solo instrumental of warning.
Once upon a time I was in Tasmania, I was paddling the Franklin River with some friends
I really like how it turned out. I wasn’t expecting the reaction I got from my son when he saw all of the pieces finally as one. He was elated! In fact, I have not yet been able to weave in all of the yarn ends as he doesn’t want to give it up. He saw it on the floor, final product for me to appraise and immediately began to dance on it! It was very cute.
Everyone gets three chances and can play them any way they want. So far I have 35 players, so that's 105 entries. I am having fun with this. There's still time to enter. Check out Life at RuffHaven to see if you might be interested in any of the goodies. Now off you go to see what everyone else has on their work space this week.
Thou common friend, that's without faith or love,
1 descriptions
*A blog and reviews are not necessary to participate. If you have a blog, then please post a challenge sign up and link THAT post (not your home page) into the linky on the page linked above. Non-bloggers, please leave a comment declaring your challenge level.
The Secret’s In the Telling by Dashboard Confessional
All in all it was a great birthday, but now I cringe when someone asks how old I am! ;)
ways we could never think of.
The Pizza Hut at NIU is loud during dinnertime, but one table of two dozen students is conspicuously quiet. The patrons don’t speak. They order by pointing at the menu.
19 Broadcaster - England (radio edit)
Eulogy's Secret by Grace Elliot
I have been wondering whether to share this with you or not, as it is very personal.
They should consider a strategic and honourable withdrawal now. Any future occupations, wherein they will be able to bring their case and arguments back to public consciousness, would be more credible. At the moment the public are presently fatigued by this stale news item and are anticipating the inevitable violent conclusion that usually involves riot police etc.
“Regardless if you’ve just picked up a new project or are looking to sell a finished restoration, RK Motors Charlotte has the knowledge and resources to make the process simple,” notes Wiehe.
Being raised in a strong tradition of Southern Italian cuisine, I’ve had the pleasure of experiencing the most creative uses of nature’s simplest ingredients. Peppers were most assuredly one of them. Green and red bell peppers, slender fryers – both hot and sweet – pepperoncini, you name it. They all made an appearance on my mother’s dinner table in the most luscious ways imaginable.
Q Have you — you’ve talked with economists, you said that economists have agreed that a deal needs to be made. Have you worked with new U.S. business leaders at all to lobby Congress to raise the debt ceiling? And if so, who are you talking to?
Me: Ok, thanks.
Our favorite family outings are to the zoo, as that is our thing. David loves animals at the petting zoo and loves to make animal sounds. We even bought the Signing Times videos for farm and zoo animals to encourage his love of animals. Zac has always been an animal lover and Steve and I were known to go to the zoo numerous times even before we had kids. He grew up going to the San Diego Zoo and I grew up going to the Toledo Zoo, both great zoos although one is a tad bit more amazing than the other. We go to the Phoenix Zoo (we are members). The picture below was taken at another regional park called Bearizona.
Surveys on NBC.com are entertaining
Way down to Kokomo (Beach Boys)
1) Missing the last bus
The finish was exactly what I wanted, but there was still too big of a contrast between the base coat and the brightness of the metallic finish.
Stamps: Solo Flight (Monica) HMJR 1105
Without even cracking a book or opening a new browser tab, I would wager that people slept better in the past. Past generations were less distracted, worked harder, and ate food with shorter ingredient lists. Although mortality and morbidity improved with medical advancements and technological change, individuals that survived childhood diseases prior to the turn of the twentieth century were probably more resilient than our chair bound generation. They also were replete with unfulfilled desires (see any Jane Austin or similar novel) so they probably enjoyed applying their energy to all that bone-grinding hard work.
In this 2007 edition, produced in black and white, Sophia Loren appears simply on a bed with white sheets, in erotic poses, but not nude, in a quest for simplicity that marks a break with the previous editions of the calendar, published by first time in 1964.
Bobby Whitlock keyboards, vocals
Here's a sneak peek at their review:
Ever since I assumed my present office my main purpose has been to work for the pacification of Europe, for the removal of those suspicions and those animosities which have so long poisoned the air. The path which leads to appeasement is long and bristles with obstacles. The question of Czechoslovakia is the latest and perhaps the most dangerous. Now that we have got past it, I feel that it may be possible to make further progress along the road to sanity.
information detailing the quantity and types of jobs that will be created by your business.
The panel was so much fun. When it comes to discussing how authors start writing and eventually become published, this was probably the most diverse group of authors imaginable. Their "origin" stories were crazy-ridiculous!
Note that you can change your browser settings to disable cookies if you have privacy concerns. Disabling cookies for all sites is not recommended as it may interfere with your use of some sites. The best option is to disable or enable cookies on a per-site basis. Consult your browser documentation for instructions on how to block cookies and other tracking mechanisms.
But wise friends talked me out of it, arguing that poplar would never hold up to the cherry top considering that the bench would be broken down for transport on occasion.
Remove the bowl from the pan and place it on a stand mixer fitter with the whisk attachment and whip until the mixture has cooled considerably and has formed stiff peaks. Lower the speed of the mixer and add the vanilla extract. With the mixer still on low, gradually add the butter mixture and whip until combined.
Moving holidays and why I miss Arroyo’s administration.
During that time, me and my team were developing a website which needs this functionality. But when our roadmap change and we doesn’t need this great feature anymore, I no longer provide any updates or support for this plugin.
Sam and I quietly got ready and woke up Caleb up. He's our eleven year old, and he is the family "worrier." I shouldn't say that- he is a nurturer. He has gone in with Lily for all of her shots, and if she is upset or sick, Caleb tries to take over mothering her. He is going to make a great daddy some day- he has the same compassionate, affectionate, protective personality his dad does. So when he asked me...begged me...last night to go in with us this morning, I could not resist :)
Two months.
as she gales,
Side note: when you attend college in the middle of nowhere, where it reaches over 100 degrees in the summer, you start to get desperate for swimwear and you end up with bikinis from Old Navy.
The next post will feature first hand accounts of the Titanic tragedy.
* Examples:
Two people flipped a 205 lb. tire back and forth while the other person completed 10 KB swings (with a 70#!) and 30 double unders for a total of 10 min. I’ve never used a 70# KB in a WOD before and it was a monster! My forearms are still sore from that dang tire too! The other ladies did amazing and it was so fun to get a good workout in.
Again, an interesting choice of language. This is different from the “fear of the LORD” seen elsewhere in the Old Testament. But it definitely communicates that the people are responding to God and not to Saul, and it drives them to work together as one team.
Start planning & saving.
“Okay, Dr. Borden, if you say so.”
The Society of Industrial and Office Realtors, in its SIOR Index, agreed that vacancy rates are “beginning to level” but that rents remain depressed and sublease inventory is high. Their index improved 2.8 points to 41.0 at the end of the 2nd Quarter, it’s third consecutive quarterly improvement. However, with market equilibrium equal to a 100 on the index, we have a long way to go.
That's what had a somewhat blissed Brian O'Reilly and a very happy John Giannopoulis so pleased when I ran into them. The Goat Races was not only still big in the rain, it was still big with the same kind of crowd. Folks brought their families, they watched the silliness of racing goats, they ate good food (really: we had bratwurst, I got some Shellbark Farms chevre), and some of them had really good beer, too. It was a really normal kind of thing; wonderfully so.
.... mean that I can garden after supper!!
3. Line three baking sheets with parchment paper or silpats. Transfer the batter to a large pastry bag fitted with a large, plain tip. Squeeze as much air out of the bag as possible, then begin piping your macaron shells. Pipe small rounds (about 1.5 inches in diameter) onto the baking sheet, spacing them about 2 inches apart.
Why does it take 5 matrices for the intuitive program to really understand human psyche and the feeling of love?
I have always loved flowers... I grew up in a home filled with flowers... Camellias, azaleas, hydrangeas and agapanthus were my mother's floral palette with the occasional bowl of blossom if the Sydney winds and rain permitted. The choices were not sophisticated, they were home grown blooms cut fresh from the garden and tweaked with some kind of natural greenery. They were simple and pretty and most importantly I learned that flowers can change the nature and ambience of a room.
I'm sure everyone is happy it is Friday!! I'm getting ready for a couple of big blog hops. I hope you join them. I'm in the process of trying to get all of the kids out of bed and out to school. Today seems harder, than others. I think they have summer fever. I'm going to show you this really cute apple I put together, yesterday. I thought the Lady Bug magnet turned out really nice on my freezer, so I decided to make another magnet. You can get your own Apple with a Worm at http://www.scrappingwithlisadesigns.com/item_34/Apple-With-Worm.htm under the dollar downloads.
I have failed. I did not post last night.
The stimulation is unrelenting.
Liz explained that these forests in this area are choked with rhododendrons which can be quite impossible to penetrate when in full leaf. So much so that early hunters dubbed them "rododendron hell" and they could actually walk on top of them! I'm betting that they are beautiful when in bloom, however.
Since California voters legalized the death penalty in 1978, the state has executed 13 inmates, while the number who linger on death row has climbed to more than 700.
- Splash of lime juice
2. Using a stand mixer fitted with the paddle attachment, or a hand mixer, cream butter and sugars together at medium speed until light-coloured, about 5 minutes. Add eggs one at a time, mixing well after each addition. Stir in the vanilla.
LWO: Lawrence Welk's On
I have been using Blogger but I wanted to give WordPress a try and I need a fresh start anyway!
which makes you Special & Superbly Rosy
Or do you prefer to fly (Or do you prefer to have everything and be Illuminated)
Enter your email address to subscribe and be the first to get previews of new material and an ecclectic mix of posts. Plus every subscriber gets a free short story. What's not to like.
1/sword/skull – removes the Staff, but mishap occurs and results in 1 health point lost.
let me lay down beside you,
I have applied @ two hospitals for the summer nurse extern program. I should know by the second week of May if I got accepted into one. I might end up moving for the summer, it just depends on the hospital I get into to. If I move I will be gone for roughly 8-10 weeks, I will be staying at my grandmas..this means if I can't find an internet provider to allow me to get service w/out a contract I will be going ALL summer without internet, unless I take the laptop to a wifi "hotspot" in town.
I can hardly wait to ink these babies up, but I won't be getting them anytime soon. I'm in die collecting mode right now. I need to be ready when the new true 8.5x11 Grand Calibur is available from A Muse in a few weeks. In the meantime, take a look at the stamp sets that almost made the cut:
Sri Sri Ravi Shankar: Truly? Is there any false forgiveness?
In its glorious greenery, whether rain or shine, it’s still beautiful
It doesn’t seem quite right.
“Are you crazy? That phone cost me a fortune.”
Alfie and I tried our hands, and hooves, at the Level 2 test which comprises an orienteering course on the first day of up to 20km followed by a Control of Paces test and a "PTV" course on the second day.
It is a dangerous thing to create a society of frustrated young men. Feminists have no idea what a can of worms they’ve created — and what it’s about to do to our nation.
from the bed to the toilet
It's not so hard to see
Regardless, I leave telling Mom and Dad I had fun and in the end that's what it's all about.
One Bill, besides Belichick, who will be feeling some pressure is Ryan Fitzpatrick. After blowing hot and cold last season he’ll need to play consistantly week in, week out. Can you imagine the outcry in Buffalo, (and Toronto…), if the Bills excel against the Patriots and keep them to just 17 points and the offence struggles and manages just the 14?
I honestly don’t remember much of the proposal part. I know the first thing I said was “Noooo” then I said “yes” of course. I was pretty speechless. I always thought I would be screaming my head off, but I just started crying and there were a lot of ohmygods thrown in there too.
June 20, 2008 — Casey Anthony is captured in various photos partying at the Fusion nightclub and participating in a “hot body contest.”
The “sword of the Lord”–trumpets, torches, and shouting—so terrified the Midianites they began killing each other. The survivors fled.
5) Read the Book “Go The F#$% To Sleep”
Of course, consistency works the other way as well, especially if you consistently do things that are bad for your health, be that physical, emotional, or financial. Credit card debt often builds to unattainable levels not because it’s used for big purchases, but because they get used for lots of little ones. The best thing I found was to just leave them at home! Nothing beats cash.
2) Sky Forensics
Now, that's a nice thank you!
Several of his white neighbours thought he was being too difficult, preferring to keep quiet, even giving to the Zanu-PF donation-gatherers when they called round. If they came to Mount Carmel Mr Campbell would tell them, straight, that the country was a disaster with no diesel or electricity, tea or sugar; so he wasn’t paying a cent to them. And when Nathan Shamuyarira, Mugabe’s minister of information, turned up with his retinue to say that the farm now belonged to him personally, or a relative of the minister appeared in his Toyota Prado taking pictures of “our” orchards, Mr Campbell told him he would have to kill him first.
½ cup apple sauce
Margaret Fieland, Author– lives and writes in the suburbs west of Boston, MA with her partner and five dogs. She is one of the Poetic Muselings. Their poetry anthology, Lifelines http://tinyurl.com/LifelinesPoetry/ is available from Amazon.com Her book, “Relocated,” will be available from MuseItUp Publishing in July, 2012. The Angry Little Boy,” will be published by 4RV publishing in early 2013. You may visit her website, http://www.margaretfieland.com.
Loose coalition? What about Samy Vellu telling you off
Is the adoption
1600° C says:
Presently, the grouping of pro and anti Christ Forces is seen to be taking place. The US and NATO clearly appear to be on the side of the Anti-Christ and siding with the Zionists the real anti-Christ Forces. Zionists are known to be Satan worshipers in their secret hideouts therefore are working to create a godless world and control the entire resources.
If the resolution was right, I would not have made Singapore my home, much less become a citizen and assimilate by actively participating in grassroots matters.
The GABF is the largest beer festival in America; where American breweries can showcase their beers and compete against other breweries around the country. It is not only for the little guys, the big three compete as well. The only stipulation is that the brewery must be located in our great nation.
to make its swing-muscled
House of Representatives. Vote on Tobacco Plain Packaging Bill and Trademarks Amendment Bill as amended by the Senate. Official Hansard No 18, Monday 21st November, Forty-third Parliament, First session–Fourth period 2011:12913.
As you can well imagine, she didn’t teach like other teachers. And as far as I was concerned, our principal, Mister Attabee, deserved a medal for giving her free rein, for her approach was not only revolutionary but it worked . . .
oh wow do I love this small space located in the beautifully designed home of Williams-Sonoma Home creative director Monelle Totah. (seen in Elle Decor 8/09) I actually had blogged Monelle's bedroom last summer {kind of my prelude to the small space dwellers series itself.} I also had the pleasure of meeting and working with her earlier this year. I also might have told her I would move in to her home if she didn't mind because it's so pretty! :) I wanted to share her room in the small space dwellers series because there are some fantastic and easy small space ideas and solutions going on that anyone can use. Let's take a look at some of them below.
Rapunzel is cast off into the wilderness to fend for herself after being imprisoned for years in a tall tower and her love is blinded...blinded when he believes he will never see her again.
The city’s roads are measured on a scale, called the overall condition index, from 1 to 100 — 100 being a perfect road and 0 being a road at the absolute end of its lifespan. The city’s average is 55.8, which is estimated to fall to 46.9 over 10 years. It would cost $640 million over the next decade to maintain the status quo and avoid that decline.
So, remember that Sarn at Stamping for Pleasure is always on hand to offer advice and obviously would be delighted to place a Stampin' Up order for you. She ain't a pushy demonstrator so I'm doing a little bit of pushing for her today :)
When I found you, my love
In my house you need to be very wary when you undertake the seemingly innocuous task of removing meat from the freezer for dinner. Careful inspection may reveal that what you are about to cook for dinner may not be 5-star mince from Coles…but…a bulk pack of frozen blood worms for feeding GrumpyDaddy’s collection of Australian native fish and other creatures.
Part of this also might have something to do with science itself. Science is an inherently positive discipline in some ways, or at least it is perceived as such. We like to think of it as constantly striding forward, fixing problems, uncovering truths. Such a glorious and wonderous discipline cannot lead to tragedy! Why, that would mean we, humanity, were fundamentally wrong about something, and we can’t have that. Oh no no no! We dare not even think of such things!
Don't do that Doreen, the helicopter is not built for it. Doreen..., Doreen? Doreen, put that young man down, we may need him.
The table above shows some evidence that government expenditure does not necessarily influence GDP the way other aggregates do, and the effects can be random indeed: government expenditure is just as volatile as the most volatile aggregate in an economy (Investment) yet it is also the least correlated to GDP. The only way that generous increase in government expenditure can pick up growth is through the subsidy to household consumption. In an ideal world, the Finance Ministry would provide us with a technical note to explain and illustrate the model they are using to forecast growth, and more importantly, the contribution to growth per aggregate. One thing is sure though, the present increase in expenditure doesn’t help, and the boomerang effect will be painful.
So let me define what a bonus clause is for an author.
Hello everyone! I have a personal favor to ask of each of you :) If you wouldn't mind taking a moment to go to the link below and vote for my beloved Tucker in the 106.1 KISS FM Doggie Duel contest. I have the chance to win $500 cash (and this lady could sure use that right about now...) and $500 worth of goodies for my pup!
I bought the patterns to the elves 1 year ago. I had to print them, cut them and then trace then on the color card stock I wanted. So that means I cut them twice each (26 total). But I enjoy cutting them by hand. Even though I am looking into the program that will cut them and the machine that will be best for the program. If anyone that reads my blog knows which machine and program is best please email me the info. I would really appreciate it.
Are you excited for Spring?
I know, I know, you've all heard this before with Oprah's Gratitude Joural (which I did on and off, mostly off for a stint some fifteen years ago when my mom gave me a copy of Sarah Ban Breathnach's book, Simple Abundance: A Daybook of Comfort and Joy) but perhaps it bears repeating. Or at the very least reminding.
Note: No yolk = No vitamin D. So tell the next person you see ordering an egg white omlet this fact please.
Hell yes!
All pictures courtesy of: www.glamsham.com
Karen Tierney of Studio Trousseau has been a design professional for over 25 years in the Bay Area. Her focus is on designing and producing custom-made wedding gowns and historic gowns, and the restoration and preservation of historic gowns—particularly the lacework. Her detailed work reflects her ability to blend history with fashion-forward style.
Serve the duck breast sliced or whole on a puddle of the reheated Apicius sauce. Simply cooked fresh veg is as good as anything else alongside it.
I think the subject that I found the most interesting was the explanation of typology prophecy and antitypes. For instance, Matthew 1:22-23 (NASB) reads "Now all this took place to fulfill what was spoken by the Lord through the prophet: 'BEHOLD, THE VIRGIN SHALL BE WITH CHILD AND SHALL BEAR A SON, AND THEY SHALL CALL HIS NAME IMMANUEL,' which translated means, 'GOD WITH US.'” This was in reference to Isaiah 7:14 (NASB) translated "Therefore the Lord Himself will give you a sign: Behold, a virgin will be with child and bear a son, and she will call His name Immanuel." However, the word almah translated "virgin" here would be more accurately "maiden." The word betulah, which would refer to virginity, was not used.
"Paperback Hardcover
Official Catholic policy condemns the death penalty. Perhaps the strongest argument against the death penalty is extreme bias against the poor, minorities or those with diminished mental capacity. Although homicide victims are 6 times more likely to be black rather than white, 77 % of death penalty cases involve white victims.
God this weather is so annoying; I swear it was at least ten degrees warmer last week. Not that she could do anything about it, her attempts at layering weren’t helping whatsoever.
2 tsp. red pepper flakes
Once the tomatoes are well stirred in and heated up a bit, put the lid on and place in the preheated 325F oven for two hours. I recommend you spend that time closing the doors to ever room that contains clothing in your apartment and putting all of the jackets in the closet, unless you want to smell like the kid who is cooking chili in his pants.
Dimensions : 198 x 117 x 9.8mm
Five days ago, Claire found Dinah's diary and discovered why.
Ink: Celery, black
From Ambrose's treatise Of the Christian Faith (Book I.VIII.54)
thermometer, with cops in their
Another athletic nickname came from my jumping ability. I have always had a great vertical jump, which has always given me pride, being particularly petite. So one of my brother’s best friends used to call my Frogger. Having an Atari, then Commodore 64, at that period of my life probably helped inspire that nickname as well.
They didn’t have to know the answers to those questions for God was planning it all the way. How often do you worry about the trivialities of the day? You’ve heard the expression, “Why worry when you can pray?” I cannot imagine Paul worrying about the future and the reason; He knew it was all in the hands of God for it was at His direction.
This is why I need a hot Frenchman to take my mind off of my American friend! Why couldn’t my friend have been unattractive and boring?? We always have such a great time together and enjoy each other’s company. It seems to be getting worse! I know he is off limits but I am increasingly attracted to him.
This story made me think. And it still haunts me.
I'm way behind the times, I know. For years and years I've been a book addict. Not just a reading addict, but a touch-the-pages-smell-the-binding sort of book addict. Nothing smells as good to me as fresh book.
Final Week: Kimora Lee Simmons Runway
“But the need to be this afraid, and the idea that the threat we face is so profound that the FBI can’t handle it, the Justice Department can’t handle it, the police can’t handle it, a Supermax prison can’t handle it, the prison industry can’t handle it — that’s the foundation that lets everything else happen. That’s the foundation that lets it be OK to suspend the Constitution, that’s the foundation that lets it be OK to start new wars… So actually in a funny way, if we don’t have this, then a lot of the pressure for massive security industrial complex starts to go away.”
-Sugar. Yes, that's right. My daughter has a food intolerance to SUGAR.
“In Mali, we don’t need more telecommunications investments,” Niang states. “We need to be producing food for people to eat. There’s a whole generation of young entrepreneurs right here in Mali. But if you’re hungry, you can’t study at school, you can’t start a business, and you can’t have respect and dignity.”
While the paper said [in its editorial] it hoped that George W. Bush’s version of events would be vindicated by historians, the Post’s “Reliable Sources” gossip column had run a big article about the public relations blitz for the movie and its various premiers in Washington, D.C. Plame “is more than happy with ‘Fair Game,’ the movie based on her memoir,” the article said. No kidding.
That's my boy! I have taught him well. :)
There's a blog hop, so that you can see more inspiring mini quilts. Here are the places to visit:
What makes them the “expert” on this subject??
PR in the entertainment industry is just one of the many focuses of PR. Entertainment PR firms are most common in the larger cities with larger celebrity populations. PR professionals work in various areas that require any of the different services they provide. It is important for PR professionals to have experience in all of the areas and services that clients require.
Senior Idiot then placed a call to the Runaway Bay Police Department, located just two blocks west of the Idiot’s residence. Senior Idiot told the officer on-duty that he had overheard two men discussing a local drug dealer in town. Senior Idiot relayed the information that a suspected narcotics trafficker from the former Soviet-Bloc nation of Ukraine, code-named “Boris”, was selling large amounts of cocaine out of the front door of his home here in the tiny town of Runaway Bay. Buyers were instructed to knock 3 times on the door, push $500 in cash through the mail slot on the front door, and once Boris had counted the money, he would open the front door and provide a large baggie full of fresh product to the buyers.
credit reporting agencies are insolvent.
The decision has been taken by the being (the Central Force of Life and agreed by the nature of Matter).
Sun-AM: 1:19, 2800' ~ Green Mt.+barefoot
Let it burgeon into something so terribly ugly
Thanks here to The Drune, for permission to use the images, for giving me complete freedom in how I ran the review, and of course for producing such a good game.
Indeed, Mr A had the bright idea of ripping out the interior of the flat he bought, and moving his kitchen to the front of the house. We also had this bright idea until we realised there was nowhere to run the waste water from. Mr A was not to be hindered by this...according to Ms B, where Mr A's kitchen waste water facilites run are our responsibility too.
Mojitos
Service: Excellent service, very knowledgeable staff.
Do you know what it is to be "a turkey"? In French, you can sometimes say, "I'm going to make the ________" to say you're going to be have in a certain way. Ex: "I'm going to act like a cry baby" = "Je vais faire le bébé".
Embattled city Comptroller John Liu’s campaign treasury “is turning into a legal-defense fund.”
BBC Statement
That's the question I was asked by Paula Davies, chair of the Friends of Roade Library in Northamptonshire, one recent Friday afternoon. Well, yes, Paula. I will. Because I want to save Roade Library and all the other libraries under threat as much as you do.
Creating Social Media Context is the 55th in a series of excerpts from our book, Be a Person: the Social Operating Manual for Enterprises (itself part of a series for different audiences). We’re just past page 180. At this rate it’ll be a long time before we get through all 430 pages, but luckily, if you’re impatient, the book is available in paper form at bit.ly/OrderBeAPerson and you can save $5 using Coupon Code 62YTRFCV
Today has been a day of many questions; why must my children have a meltdown when half the world decides to walk to school? Why must my husband leave his clothes next to the laundry bag? How do I dry a hand washed duvet? - It's okay you tweeters of little faith, I'm working on it!! - but the one question I really need an answer to is: How do I fix my ripped hole?
A statement released by the coroner read as follows: “Having weighed up the evidence, it’s difficult to reach a verdict on whether the sad, sinister and ludicrously-reported death of Mr Williams was inflicted by himself or another. On the one hand, he was found dead padlocked inside a large bag, but on the other hand we also found a ladies’ wig in his bedroom and we suspect he may have been gay.
Gary Slider
I miss her laugh and how much she truly cared most about everyone but herself.
Maher first clarified his comment that Mormonism is a cult by explaining he meant to say “his ridiculous church.” He admitted that there is no real distinction between a cult and a religion, but he argued that as opposed to Catholics who are very upfront about their beliefs, Mormons tend to be more “secretive” about their faith. And that sounds cultlike to Maher, at least.
attracted. Ignoring the shaking heads. There was a small window sliced into it. A little mouth, which when spoken to by young men with lanky hair and women with glazed eyes, would spew out small parcels. Dagga, cocaine, mandrax. All yours for the asking, provided you had the money.
But in my hands, Felix the plushie was no longer Felix. He was Iño. My parents tried, to no avail, to correct my mistake by saying that my new toy's name was "el gato Felix" and not "Iño."
If the majority of American people knew Fast and Furious like they know Solyndra or the GSA scandal, they would be outraged. Despite very few exceptions, the media has been complicit in the cover-up of Obama’s bloodiest scandal by ignoring and refusing to report about it. Why? To protect the President. This scandal, one that has left hundreds of bodies in its wake, would be deadly to the administration. This is the scandal that will bring President Obama down in November, so long as the American people know its details.
Pink lady
and it seriously ROCKED.
On Thursday, I'll be linking to
Like chocolate, you know overuse is not always good for you, especially overuse in the long term!
*Randomly thought I would try out the Generic "Cosmetic/Perfume" outlet for kicks - ermm, jack pot! Bobbie Brown, MAC, Prescriptives and Clinique - all at outlet prices. Great deals, and I was superstoked - I'm still basically stuck on my favorites ( I don't stray with make-up and try new things, I like what I like) but it was great to supplement with brand names!
You have some very nifty gig fliers. Who's responsible?
First, I have a new blog! It's Nate's Mini Reviews, a site where I write very, VERY short reviews of all of my cinematic conquests. Consider it a movie journal.
By the way, the answers to questions 1 and 2 are as follows: 1) I dyed it like a crazy college kid and it faded to an ugly color that no one’s hair should be, and 2) it’s a sparkly booger. Just kidding. It’s a nose ring.
Now, I don’t want you all to think that it’s all no work and no play for the Crosstones. We have made a point to explore the city on our own and take advantage of some of the nightlife here. It may be too predictable, but the most memorable night so far has been spent at a kareoke bar where we sang some favorites and got down on the dance floor.
What a cynical joke, talking of “spirit of democracy” and silencing ALL opposition media, and even any media slightly alternative to the official version. Abhisit and his bunch of “Democrats” are such a real hypocrites, read post by BP, quote of Abhisit’s own words back in 2005 when he was a leader of opposition :
A special gift women possess
The last thing I did yesterday was going to The Bank House for a drink with the 3rd Year RAP students. We played I have never which seemed that every one revolved around sex. Then I went home and into Bed.
As I was going through the dealers room I discovered some wonderful bargains, including many obsucre comics; westerns, romance, mystery. I bought a nice stack, and, since we had stopped by Stan Goldberg's table earlier, decided to let him sign a copy of Modeling with Millie that he drew (it also happened to be one of the earliest stories that then-newcomer Roy Thomas wrote). Although I never had a chance to examine the cover up close before, I always had a suspicion that the Millie figure was not by Stan, even though he signed the cover. The huge face of Millie looled very much like Jack Kirby's work. As I handed the cover to Stan to sign, I asked him if Millie's face had been drawn by someone else. He immediately shouted "Jack Kirby!" drew that face! It is one of those moments that always thrills me. My suspicion was confirmed by the guy who drew the cover!
So this is a run of short posts about Redemption Brewery's Andy - @partizansmith and his amazing home-brews. Pretty much everything that I have tasted that Andy has brewed has been brilliant, whether it's been part of Redemption's output or as a home brew.
UPDATE: 22nd January 2012. RTE is reporting that Minister for Transport and Tourism Leo Varadkar has said in respect of the €1.25bn bond that falls due on Wednesday that the Troika has said “we don’t want you to default on these payments, it is your decision ultimately but a bomb will go off; and the bomb will go off in Dublin and not in Frankfurt.”
Well, last week was a lot of fun and I see more beautiful faces everyday joining our fun digi challenge. I will announce the winner Wednesday for last weeks challenge to give everyone a chance to vote. Please go to last weeks challenge post and leave a comment with the number/name of your favorite entry.
Le Bon
So she set up mini outdoor portrait studios in eight public parks throughout Brooklyn and made portraits of hundreds of Brooklynites, for free, which are now included in the portrait collection, and which are on display in postcard-sized prints at BRIC’s gallery.
But, deep down, I'm happy being on my own. I don't need a lot of social stuff to keep me topped up with sunshine.
-Jon Jones now has the highest SILVA score in the sport, at 102.90. Rashad Evans drops to 86.92 with his loss, and has been passed up by Alexander Gustafsson, who rises to 88.67 with his win over Thiago Silva. Gustafsson is probably the light-heavyweight with the best chance of beating Jones right now, but I still don’t think his chances are better than 20-25 percent.
Here are a few pictures for your viewing pleasure....
I told my kids I wanted them to make my house to sparkle, a birthday cake and to be a princess.
Grow
Hi everyone! I wanted to share with you the little gifts that I made for the Spellbinders ladies at the retreat. You see, we were all to bring a little something from where we lived or that said something a bit about us. I decided to give the girls an assortment of STASH tea bags. Stash is a Portland based company and has the most delish tea flavors (I also added a couple chocolates to the baggies, cause everyone loves chocolate).
Crafty bear
arches #140 coldpress
Smart companies, however, are aware of this conflict between carrying out procedures and try to remain nimble enough to be competitive. Fads such as the 1980's Japanese Management techniques (e.g., Quality Circles), and this decade's Lean Manufacturing (also out of Japan) sweep the industrial world regularly as managers strive to understand how to walk this balance.
We feel so blessed.
IP: I’m not trying to defend the tat. But it’s there because people buy it – wanting low-priced things to take home.
What do you get in return? Besides brightening a child's day, participating will enter you to win prizes from her wonderful sponsors.
It’s a little harder with God because there is no physical voice! It takes a much more intentional listening to hear God’s voice to the point where you recognize it. And that kind of listening takes intentional time with God.
And we got it all done with time to spare before baby #1 arrives.
With a reputation for awesome power, I feared the TTS would leap out of hand with revs in first gear, but the engine isn't especially torquey despite the large capacity, and doesn't produce much power at all below 2000rpm. In fact, when moving out or riding slowly, dropping below this figure meant hesitation and incipient jerkiness - just keep things on the boil and all will be well.
The table fell silent. None of us would ever have guessed her wish. Because most of us had no knowledge of her reality.
Partially, the reasons I listed above are the reasons as to why I just abstained from writing. The other half stemmed from Grad school and the now ex-boyfriend. I devoted a huge amount of time into the two so personal pursuits were put on the back burner. No excuse, but I allowed them to be. But remember how I said Nix shared a ton of similar traits with the old boy? Well, writing for him has become a bit strained since the breakup affected my perception of him, including his posh Lundun accent… which is now southern like the old guy’s. It’s very disconcerting telling your character what accent he/she can speak in. Mr. Wilson always spoke in his boisterous Boston accent, Monika using her tiny Polish lilt, but gosh darnit, I am determined to keep Nix with his snotty London accent even if it kills me.
The 1993 FBI Report to Congress states that all extremist "animal rights"
A lifetime of gator tracking and fishing up and down the Big Bend has bestowed upon Harrison an intimacy with that landscape — an understanding based on years of depending on the fruits of the sea and swamp for sustenance. No amount of gruff exterior can conceal his love of the place once he shuts down the engine along a teeming backwater creek. The propeller’s roar gives way to the uproar of crickets, frogs, and birds. Harrison points to an ibis — flash of white amid the dense green; he regales us with tales of his gator-stalking youth as he spies a pair of slitted eyes that slip silently underwater; he points out a mating pair of the largest grasshoppers we’ve ever seen, jet-black and perched on an overhanging limb. He shows us all his favorite places: lonely island beaches teeming with birds, a 100-year-old abandoned house on its own key.
15The merchants of these things, which were made rich by her, shall stand afar off for the fear of her torment, weeping and wailing,
It is raining heavily outside. I have closed the doors through which the dry leaves were trying to intrude into my privacy. It appeared as if they were finding a place to hide until rain stops. I picked the leaves and threw them to where they came from before shutting the door against them. The electricity department behaved as cowards, fearing the lighting and rain, and stopping the function of fan and tube lights. Sitting in the room writing this post and having no supply of cool air forced me to open the doors. I had accepted the risk of allowing the leaves into my home that was clean since the morning. This made me think,not torestrict the flow of ideas and to let them flow.
Turn on your camera, put it on the P-mode, look through the viewfinder (remove the lens cap if you can’t see a thing) as if you are taking a photo, and then press the shutter button halfway down. You will see the point(s) that your camera focuses on light up (shortly). You want to set your camera so that it will only focus on the middle point. The point in the centre of your viewfinder. If that is the only one that lights up when you press the shutter halfway, we have lift off! Somewhere in the instruction manual of your camera it will explain how you can do this.
Last year’s deal on the minimum wage was regarded by the SSM and the government alike as an achievement. Under the deal, workers may not earn less than 130 euros a month.
"Yeah, I hnow." I groan, "1177/66ACF/24. "Undo the System Restore."
19‑29 Results ‑ Women 5000 Run
(picture tutorial right under)
1) The world was full of anti-Afrikaner prejudice and even hate, which is evident in the sanctions imposed by the world's nations against Apartheid South Africa, and their silence regarding atrocities, massacres and genocides that dwarf it. The only moral thing to do is acknowledge the injustice done to Afrikaners and revert to the situation of 1991, before the Apartheid regime was toppled by the pressure of a hypocritical international community;
6.) I am afraid of closing my eyes when I am taking a bath. I make sure that the soap doesn’t go to my face, or if it does I rise it off quickly. I have an irrational fear that when I close my eyes too long, and then I open them, a monster will materialize inches away from my face.
Here he is... wearing my old jacket, from when I was little. :o)
Ansari was indicted in April 2011 on three counts of food-stamp fraud. In a plea bargain with the government in September, he pleaded guilty to a single count; the other two were dropped.
It’s the lifeblood of a writer to be able to generate ideas and get on with the work and perhaps creative inspiration can strike at any time, but it strikes more often when there is work instead of waiting.
I had a brief flirtation with bass clarinet, a horn more than twice the size of a clarinet with low notes that shook your whole body when you played. Since bands and orchestras only had a single bass clarinet, it was my only chance for distinction, and for a while I played for the Los Angeles Junior Philharmonic, rumbling out bass clarinet parts written by Shubert, Mahler, and Brahams. But in a world that orbited about the blazing sun of rock and roll, it simply would not do.
But then Nima starts making connections she shouldn't, between messages, between operatives, between what the rebels promise and what they do. As she delves deeper and deeper into the rebellion, she has to question whether she's helping the right side - or if the war between the Inquisition and the rebels even has a right side.
And I know I've promised in the past that I'd be writing about our debt load but once again, I'm scared. It's embarrassing to put that out there for the world to see. We've been so selfish and irresponsible with our money. Plus, my mom knows about and reads this blog. (Hi Mom!)
For this reason (ideological apoplexy), you can easily "block" people on Facebook, so you don't have to SEE their awful opinions and be annoyed by them. This is diametrically opposite to blogular life, where you can't NOT SEE what you don't want to see, unless you are the owner of the blog in question.
It was a good week here. There is always so much happening. A week I wouldn’t trade for a million bucks. I hope you all had a great week and a relaxing and wonderful weekend. God Bless you all!!
Wright is noticeably silent about the plan of salvation in How God Became King. He’s quite clear that the gospel is a gospel of salvation, but he says little on 21st century evangelistic techniques. Still, Wright has commented rather powerfully on evangelism elsewhere. He writes in Surprised by Hope of an approach to evangelism that is actually quite similar to some of McKnight’s pleas.
210 Joralemon Street, 1st Floor
If passed, the bills would collectively swamp LPC in a sea of paperwork, impossible deadlines and appeals. Five of the bills in particular draw the ire of groups like the Historic Districts Council:
Good day to you. Or is it? I’m sure you’re sitting at home enjoying the wonderful spring weather and having not a care in the world. But I’m here to inform you of a very grave matter that deserves your immediate attention. You and I are living in an unpredictable and deceiving world. Yes, it’s true; the news I have is startling and may just change the way you live and think. Friends, I’m here to tell you that Puffs brand tissues are the very epitome of evil. Oh you think I’m joking? I assure you I’m not. I’m sure you’ve never considered this idea, in fact, I’m positive you never have. But new evidence has come to light that Puffs is not only bad, but horrible.
Bottom line though: is there any point to any of this? I don’t know. I’m not sure anyone does know. But it can’t hurt. As for whether you owe me, no—no you don’t. But this is bigger than me. The fact is these days if you want to spread the joy you need to talk to the right people online. You might not know them personally but you might be friends with people who just happen to be friends of some other people who happen to be friends of friends of those people. That’s how it goes. When I’ve enjoyed a good book or a film or heard a song that’s made my hairs stand on end I want to tell people about it but here’s where the “selfish, lazy, and ruthless” quote comes in; unless it’s convenient for us, we don’t do it; we don’t go out of our way to do it; if we happen to think of it we might mention it but usually we forget. My daughter will ask, “Have you guys been watching anything good on TV?” and we’ll think and then say, “Oh, yes, have you seen (Wilfred was the last thing)?” And we’ll tell her about it, enthuse a bit and then the conversation will drift off onto some other subject; the bird will start chattering or something. The odds are she still won’t watch it. Not because she’s selfish, lazy, or ruthless but quite simply because there’s so much going on in her life that by the time she gets her coat on, gives me my hugs and kisses, gets in her car and drives homes she will have completely forgotten about it and be more concerned with what’s she’s going to fix her husband for his supper or making sure the cat receives all the attention he demands or checking to see if she has clean clothes for the morning and remembered to hand in her latest essay or, or, or…
1And there was given me a reed like unto a rod: and the angel stood, saying, Rise, and measure the temple of God, and the altar, and them that worship therein.
albums. I loved David Bowie circa 'Young Americans' too."
Album: Jag ar inte radd for morkret
* Kool & The Gang opened and were actually a helluva lot of fun.
To help with the clingyness issue we are sending him to a real preschool. I had wanted to avoid this because I am too cheap. But for him he needs a place to separate from me and places he is comfortable (i.e. church and going to friends houses for preschool) and also get used to larger groups of people and responding to authority from people he doesn't know as well. It will be hard for him at first but I know he will love it after he gets used to it.
1 cup organic quinoa
Fort Walton Beach Florida – Tallahassee Florida
these kids
“Because of the size of the project site, its location at a major transportation crossroad, and the complexities of building over the rail yard, it is not possible to develop the site without some temporary significant adverse noise and traffic impacts,” the DEIS states.
"so fun" i say.
Mabel Xaba and Maclean Kalane had decided to have something to eat at about 4pm on Monday.
The seat of Hougang was left vacant after its ex-WP MP Yaw Shin Leong was sacked from WP for his failure to address swirling rumors about his alleged extra-marital affairs with multiple married women, including a neighbor from China which is a ‘first’ in the history of Singapore.
Pause with the infrared remote is good too, but it uses Girder which can be weird with 2 copies. But really cool for comparing 2 songs to each other. One is paused, other isn’t. Push button and the status inverts. Excellent way to hear which version of the mp3 is better.
There is something about Pyrex that makes me happy while I’m baking.
The submission now appears on the consultation page. Here are a few relevant extracts:
This query clocks in at 485 words which means it's about twice as long as it should be. The 250 word maximum should guide you to paring down to what you really need. Think of it as writing a prose poem, where every word counts.
Chief air marshal
Said a puzzled Moon.
So sorry! I ate the whole pot without sharing with you.
Now someone stick a fork in me, because I am DONE.
Forgot this year, to salute the troops. They're all still there in a fucking war. It's no good. Whose idea was that?
And then a funny thing happened.
The Pils Fest is a celebration of arguably the best style of beer, the classic Pilsner. We will kick off our celebration of the Pils Fest on Thursday the 12th with the release of our award winning Hell In Keller Pils.
We flew to Portland on a Tuesday, with Wednesday and Thursday to look at houses. We were going to fly back Friday. We spend Wednesday driving from house to house (8 in total) getting more and more disappointed as none of them were quite what we wanted. That night in the hotel we broadened our search on-line and found a house that was a great deal and looked like a good fit for us! The next day we went to see it and found out there were already 9 offers on it! We decided to put in a nice high offer (I think it was about 5 grand over asking price) in hopes we could snag it. We signed the offer and walked out to the car, where I checked my e-mail. There was a message from our lawyer that said, in thick legalese, that the buyers backed out of the contract. No explanation why. Here we are in Portland, just signed an offer on a great house, and now we have no buyer on our house. I was ready to cry.
Assignment:
I love how this little chest really pops with the bolder accent pieces. The "Now" version has started me thinking about the rest of the dining room. I have a few ideas dancing in my head and I hope to post an update soon!
In a 2010 study of 23,000 married couples, however, similarity of personality accounted for just 0.5% of spousal satisfaction. In other words, 99.5% of their success together was explained by factors typically excluded from online dating questionnaires. This finding suggests that most of the vaunted algorithms are no more effective than a chance meeting at a bar.
The constitution also proposes to regain for the state a dominant role in the country’s economic steerage whilst incorporating a plurality of forms of economic practice and property ownership that suggest the possibility of a future post-neoliberal paradigm. Finally, the constitution also denounces imperialism and promises to redefine international relations, accepting the existence of interdependencies between regions and countries – just as between individuals – and building on these interdependencies through values of solidarity to deliver better futures for all. ALBA represents this collaborative experiment and a glimpse, perhaps, that better worlds are possible.
FIRST LINE: “Tian was blessed (though few farmers would have used such a word) with three patches: River Field, where his family had grown rice since time out of mind; Roadside Field, where ka-Jaffords had grown sharproot, pumpkin, and corn for those same long years and generations; and Son of a Bitch, a thankless tract which mostly grew rocks, blisters, and busted hopes.”
We would like to see orange as the main focus of your design. You can also use other colours but please make orange the standout.
If you are a friend of mine I'm assuming its #3. My husband's good friend introduced us to the team that makes Polar Bear Coolers and I wouldn't promote anything without completely testing the product first. We have the 24 pack size and while vacationing at the beach toss a whole bag of ice in the sucker and it lasts an entire day! That's right..an entire day sitting on a hot porch at Pawleys Island in 99 degree temps. That comes in handy when its 4:00 and you need to make Pinas and nobody is sober enough for an ice run.
I don't actually care how Fame ends. It was sucking the life force out of me. So, I guess you will have to watch it yourself if you want to know how it ends.
Last week, I had an appointment with my naturopath. Amid a string of questions, she asked,
Iron Lady continues to cause rift Update on McGeough’s Judicial Hearing – 6 Jan 2011 I’ve no regrets: British heiress who became an IRA bomber Cold case team is behind US terror files court battle Day to re-Joyce as The Dead dine out in Dublin Gerry McGeough suffered inequality, pardon review hears
Andere welt - Fabrik-C
Justin Hayward- Guitar/Vocals
My bluebells are out !!!
In the time of only three days, we had created a machine that spread across all the walls of ArtPlay, using chain reactions and quirky triggers. With golf balls, boots, tyres and vacuum cleaners, we set of a complete and utter wacky mechanism that self-produced its own circuit of wonder.
All in all, we really enjoyed the evening – the talk about the wines, which didn’t assume any level of prior knowledge, was interesting, and it was nice to be able to try different wines along with each of the dishes. On the face of it, the evening is not cheap, at £45 per head, but for what we had in terms of food and wine, it actually represents excellent value. I’m concerned, though, that the cost could be prohibitive for some people as it’s more than many would want to pay for a week night outing. As always, the food was good, and the service friendly and welcoming – it was clear that all the staff wanted the evening to feel special and be a success. We were asked for our feedback on the food at the end of the evening, and it seemed that they really valued our comments and were keen to take them on board.
Though many New Orleans restaurants serve dishes purporting to be Oysters Rockefeller, Antoine’s claims that no other restaurant has been able to successfully duplicate the recipe. Knock-off versions of the dish have proliferated in New Orleans, developed to capitalize on the fame of Antoine’s signature dish, but because the recipe for Oysters Rockefeller was passed down from the creator, Jules Alciatore of Antoine’s to his children, and has apparently never left the family’s hands, competing restaurants have had to formulate their own recipes.
In Britain, and elsewhere in Europe it has now been established in law that telling the truth can be a criminal offence (and we laughably still call ourselves a free society)
“Each song teeters beautifully between Queen and The Killers - there ain’t no shame in this neo-glam electropop game” (NME)
I must have been a very good girl this year because this gentleman visited me a couple of nights ago and left me plentiful gifts. To be completely honest, my parents spoiled me beyond belief. As well as diverse presents such as The Inbetweeners on DVD, some Strictly Come Dancing goodies, my favourite perfume and - the ultimate in sexy stylishness - a snuggie (!), I was also given books and money (which, in my world, always somehow translates into books.
Speaking of that certain couple, another of oldest and dearest friends is Julie Corman Baggett. I've known Julie since before I was old enough to remember. There is a picture of the two of us around age 5 or 6 in little red leotards getting ready to preform in "Oklahoma." We were friends all through high school and lost touch a little while we were in college, but reconnected when I moved to Birmingham to do my internship. When I moved back for good, we basically just picked up where we left off. Our husbands are big golfing buddies now and I even knew she was getting engaged before she did! (We did good Nick!) Anyway, I consider her as close to a sister as one can be. They came over to help us move into the new house (on her birthday....now that's a good friend!) and we told them that we were expecting. They were so shocked and I'll never forget the look on Julie's face when I told her my due date. Fast forward 2 weeks and they came over for Memorial Day to each lunch with us. We are sitting at the table eating lunch when Nick dropped the bomb that they too were expecting a little Baggett Baby! I wish there had been a video of my reaction...not only to that news, but to the news that we are DUE ON THE SAME DAY!!!! I mean, what are the chances?!?!? I am so excited to have someone to share this crazy journey and to talk to when there are crazy things going on with my body that husbands just don't understand. This is where my jealousy comes from....because they already have a picture! :) But seriously, I'm so excited to have our babies at the same time so they can grow up together and be best little friends!!
Imagine if you take the bits from the Threat from the Deep where the oceans and seas become more dangerous, and add in the threats from the Nehtril Shadow Wizards, and add in the reclusion of the Elves, and add in the dragons rampaging across the realms, and add in Thay becoming an undead nation with negative energy all over the lands and Sembia becoming a Thrall state to Nethril and and and... It may sound like a lot, but when you think about everything that is going on all the time, isn't there some sense in a setting as large as the Forgotten Realms having multiple crisis points going on all the time?
Thank you Bess & Jon for this beautiful gift.
Although readers of this blog would have been born when these two contestants first locked horns, many would still have been at junior school. Litigation commenced in 1993, after Brent failed to pay Forrester Ketley's fees and expenses in respect of patent-related work. The trial judges who heard the dispute were, at various times, Jacob J, Laddie J and Morgan J; the dispute has been been to the Court of Appeal before, in 2001 (here) and twice again in 2005 (here and here).
what do you think of typing up the textbook instead of hand writing it?
Hubby: Okay, let me add up your score. See? I knew it! You score in the "I Want Whatever She's Having" category.
“Why?” I pressed. “I mean, since when did we start keeping secrets from one another?”
He still has a job.
AR-02 Vic Snyder MT-AL Denny Rehberg
“I’ll admit it. Earth quakes are kind of scary. :s”
He observed: “On November 13, 2009, the day of incident, the accused returned from work at noon and was served with meal by his wife. Instead of feeling obliged to her for providing him food, he did the most heinous act by pouring kerosene oil on her and setting her ablaze, which resulted not only in her death but also of the foetus she was carrying. There is no mitigating circumstance in favour of the accused. Thus, the act of the barbarity committed by the accused makes it a rarest of the rare case where only capital punishment is to be given”.
89. Do you like a clear blue sky, or one with big fluffy clouds? - Though the clear blue sky can be breathtaking in the fall against the golds, oranges and reds, I prefer looking at a sky filled with clouds. My favorite clouds are the types that have a bit of purple and blue mixed in with the white.
If you’re not quite sure, come take a look at the forums anyway. Maybe you’ll get caught up in the excitement, too!
1-in-3,357
As I mentioned, these walls are thin–very very thin. It is as if these kids are in the same cabin as me. Understand, then, that when they start blasting various rap songs–English rap songs, I might add–in the other room, it is exactly as if they were in this room blasting music (keep in mind “blasting” is a very relative term: from a speaker system it might actually be loud but from a laptop–as I assume it is–”blasting” is simply noisy enough to be an annoyance). This alone doesn’t make for comedy, I know. Let me add, then, that these well-refined gentlemen consider themselves to be rappers, and be it from some drug-addled ecstasy or simple overconfidence, they feel obliged to rap alongside these songs. I’m not sure if they’re trying to match the lyrics, or if they’re freestyling while ignoring the song’s lyrics. English is not their first language, you see, and it is not a kind friend to them either through pronunciation or basic vocabulary. Listening to this for the past two hours has been rather amusing, but there’s even more to this train trip–the icing on this little cake of cross-culture shock, so to speak.
That is about all I know for now. Have a great week!
The word nova means "new" in Latin, referring to what appears to be a bright new star in the night sky. Occasionally these explosions cause what appears to be a new star in the sky. The prefix 'super-' separates a supernova from an ordinary nova, which also involve a star increasing in brightness, though to a lesser extent and through a different mechanism.
How do you handle calls verifying your information on your application?
If I try to walk him on a leash, he sits down and refuses to budge.
And...12 hours later literally, I'm hoping to post this. My Friday was horrible actually...lost Joel's wallet downtown, had a sick one (who threw up all over the couch...poor thing), ran out of diapers and milk (that I was supposed to get but lost the wallet instead). Ha. Glad it's over. I'm about to hit the reset button and hope for a great weekend. You have a great one too.
The muffled thump was followed by cursing – in English, Xu Guan was almost sure of it. The door handle rattled as it came into contact with the dresser drawer wedged beneath. Two sharp clanks followed the rattling. Xu Guan could hear something inside the door handle give way under the assault. There was a loud clang as the horizontal handle went limp and fell, useless, against the dresser drawer.
I hung a quilt on the wires that hold the porch curtains - if we'd eaten outside, this would've been hung on the clothesline - but the same effect was accomplished either way.
The prognosis is clear now: the malignancy that Norman Mailer called “pre fascist” has metastasized. The US attorney-general, Eric Holder, defends the “right” of his government to assassinate American citizens. Israel, the protege, is allowed to aim its nukes at nukeless Iran. In this looking glass world, the lying is panoramic. The massacre of 17 Afghan civilians on 11 March, including at least nine children and four women, is attributed to a “rogue” American soldier. The “authenticity” of this is vouched by President Obama himself, who had “seen a video” and regards it as “conclusive proof”. An independent Afghan parliamentary investigation produces eyewitnesses who give detailed evidence of as many as 20 soldiers, aided by a helicopter, ravaging their villages, killing and raping: a standard, if marginally more murderous US special forces “night raid”.
4. Bizarre Dub Triangle (7" edit)
Well, I have three cards to show you today, cards I have done for occasions that required a card with a message.. including a Christmas card. I had in mind to do a lot of Christmas cards, but well.. plans...!!!
“Of course not, GB!” said Sally giggling. “A carrot can’t have sex with a glass!”
First to speak for the motion was the former Archbishop of Canterbury, George Carey, who argued that Arab governments must legislate to protect minorities, referring to numerous examples throughout the Arab world where minorities have been persecuted and where many have had to flee their home countries.
Now, almost getting lost among these dates, is my 40th Wedding Anniversary on May 2nd. Linda and I have booked a weekend away, that will now have to be cut short in order for me to be back in the City for the 3rd.
Book Club Notes from February 28th
The child’s voice is a device, like any other literary device, and I like its limitations. There’s only so much a child will understand and as the writer you have to be aware of that. And tread carefully.
Pete and John exchanged a bunch of emails and pictures, while Pete researched what it would take to get the Z up and running again. After much thought and discussions we decided that we would go to Chicago and look at the car and if we were still comfortable with it, we would trailer it home.
Here’s a rarity! Figures leaving the collection.
Now back to this post's title, some time ago some of you may remember that I was given a lovely 1964 Hercules tandem by my Nan and Grandad. When we got it it looked like this, not the cleanest of bikes but in great working order.
Flamin' Groovies - Flamingo
Spring has sprung in the City of Light! Want to know how I can tell? Could it be the rows of daffodils that have flowered in the local park? The blossoms that have appeared on the cherry trees on Boulevard Richard Lenoir? Or is it that subtle shift in the attitude of the locals from permanently-annoyed to just-plain-pouty?
It’s official. The Prospect Heights Historic District was formally designated last Thursday, when the City Council’s Committee on Land Use voted unanimously to support the largest landmark designation in New York City in almost 20 years. The Council is expected to confirm the vote of the committee on September 17.
Level 1: MP Cost: 25, Duration: 30 seconds, Damage: +112%.
My nuwe vriend Chong antwoord toe as volg:
Oh my goth. Oh my goth indeed. The title of the collection was particularly apt. Hardly a goth-like figure in sight, as clown-like flared trousers jostled for attention against Rosette-strewn skirts. There was plenty of black in there, don't get me wrong. But you barely noticed it. And it didn't seem like the heavy, headache-inducing, angry sort of black that a lot of designers spew forth. There was a lightness to it all, which was the most intriguing thing. Oh my goth might as well be an exclamation, both of incredulity and surprise, though not, we might add, an unwelcome one. The goth girl is all grown up. And look how far she has come.
Damn. Great body for one of the lighter styles. Good grassy bitter pop up front, with a solid malt taste and twangy finish. Bitterness sticks on the back of the tongue and stays for a while. Not in a bad aftertaste sort of way, but in a solid taste kind of way. I'll have to keep a look out for this brewery, and hope that all of their beers are like this.
What isn't at all unusual about the story is the mainstream media's reluctance to cover a case of black-on-white crime. In particular, I cited the Birmingham News (BN), whose crime-beat reporter, Carol Robinson, had brusquely dismissed the incident as not newsworthy. She now has finally treated it -- no doubt as a result of pressure -- but in a manner so incomplete that it reflects a grudging attitude. More on that in a moment.
‘Well, the roads run straight enough now.’
First, I foam rolled my IT bands, my calves, and then spend a long, long time foam rolling my ass.
went to Astley Mr T Lees fixd. to come but did not come till Eleven oclock and I went without him therefore we did not make out the accounts today
We are all here to spiritually wake up to the wondrous, magnificent beings that we really are…To make friends with our true Self. Here is a big assignment for the weekend. Think of one “label” that you have accepted as true about yourself and question it. A wonderful prayer is: “I wonder what my life would feel like, if I was willing to let go of the idea that I am (fill in the blank with the negative label)” You don’t have to dig through your past and find the root of the negative image. You can simply start claiming the opposite, and just like the negative was accepted years ago, the new thought will also be (eventually!) accepted if you stay with it. It is time that we all made friends with ourselves.
JUICY… but unlikely!”
"We have a new resident............... Male...... lung cancer....... spread to the brain"............
I think my dream was trying to tell me something about my dear friend.
OH YES..
At times I have used cloth diapers for my babies. I really wanted to go all cloth for Caedmon, but Jeff didn't want to invest that much money into diapers that would most likely only be used for one child. Caedmon is still in diapers, but is working on potty training and is wearing training pants a good bit of the day.
The LOST story is filled with so many layers of everything that makes up people, life, struggle, pain, rewards, love, hope, purpose, destiny, death and rebirth. We all had many ways to watch this show, and different things to take from it, or you didn't have to take anything at all from it. My entire experience with this LOST journey became a part of my life, played a role in my own personal growth and enlightenment, and made me a better person. This story changed my life on so many levels. I was open to all the possibilities this story had to offer. I enjoyed the magic even while it inadvertently became my teacher and guide. There always was a message, lessons and answers in the story. We were able to watch this epic unfold in a literal and metaphoric way.
(=^X^=) (=^ェ^=)™
Those are pearls that were his eyes.
This is narrated by Alex Kalajzic. Who is brilliant. The series is from England, so Alex has an accent and the various boys he encounters have accents from various parts of the UK.
With the fast approach of summer and the sun rising earlier each day, my morning is starting to begin earlier as well. It’s a funny thing, during the winter when the sun doesn’t rise until well after seven, it is difficult for me to motivate and feel like it’s time to get up before the sun does. But the converse is also true, that as the sun comes up earlier each day, so does my body’s natural tendency to want to begin the day. All the more reason that I have to be disciplined and get to bed at a reasonable hour. For me, surviving on less than 8 hours of sleep can only last a few days before some pretty serious attitude challenges will dominate my vertical time interacting with the world.
In most large cities, grocery delivery has already existed for years (and when I say large, I know of at least one store in Troyes (pop. 60k) that offers this service, so we're talking from small to major cities). In most cases, you can either do your groceries like normal, but at the check out your groceries are boxed up and delivered to your home at the hour of your convenience, or you can order online and your order arrives at a predetermined time. This is especially helpful if you live in an apartment and dread the idea of dragging bag after bag of groceries up the stairs.
And lest you think that we have been ignoring our blog while on holiday, I will let you in on a secret. Emma has been busy photographing like mad the entire trip, for an upcoming series of posts on the blog featuring knits made by my mother and grandmother in the 1950s, 1960s and 1970s. Be sure to stay tuned, as the Southwestern theme continues! And remember folks:
I am a knitter. I am not a particularly good knitter nor am I an accomplished knitter. I am a pick-up-easy-projects-when-I-can knitter. You know, little easy baby hats in the round, that kind of thing.
I’d like to begin this section of the excursus by drawing your attention to the work of Jonathan Z. Smith–a renowned professor at the Divinity School of the University of Chicago, about whom I’ve written briefly previously–in particular an essay that he wrote called “Here, There, and Anywhere,” which was the opening essay of the excellent anthology Prayer, Magic, and the Stars in the Ancient and Late Antique World. (I’d recommend the whole anthology, but anyway…!?!) Smith’s essay suggests that in the ancient world and late antiquity, one can clearly see that different religious phenomena fall into the categories of “here,” “there,” or “anywhere.” (I’ve also written about that previously.)
Following are excerpts from speeches delivered by prominent Sunni scholar Sheikh Yousuf Al-Qaradhawi, which aired on Al-Jazeera TV on January 28 and 30, 2009.
At first, I believed the creed: You deserve the best in life, and so do I. There is something symbolic with placing the “I” after “you”.
We were faced with 11 exams, which itself is a daunting task. I helped in an adjacent autopsy room with one doctor. We had just finished up our second exam just before 11AM and were preparing to start on a third. I stepped into the main autopsy suite to find our where the other team was in relation to the caseload and asked about their status and their plans for further examinations. (I was unaware at the time that an inquiry had already been made in regards to their progress.) I then returned to my station and continued helping the doctor.
their untidy progression?
some G (spot) force
that i breathe
I’m not sure I was. In fact, I probably wasn’t. I was planning to take the world by storm – solo. So when I met Matt, well, actually … it was pretty darn amazing. But it was a little frightening too.
Focaccia Bread (makes 1 loaf)
Oh and before I go, I have got to tell you about the new release Inky stamps!! I got my dt package this morning and all I can say is WOW!!! They are adorable!! :) If you haven't already checked them out, you can see all the new release rubber stamps and also the new digital stamps here in the Inky Impressions Store.
When police arrived to question the woman and free Schulz she invited two officers to join her in bed for a ‘quickie.’
I would say they got pretty far considering.
First – a Door of Grace and Reconciliation is opened where, in faith, we lay down our sins and our burdens before Him and appropriate the forgiveness and freedom He won for us 2000 Years ago on His Cross!
Fry the frog legs until they turn golden brown and crispy
Time to FEEL into the movements of the last year and to process them all so that we can move into the new planting time of the next year for renewed growth and strength. This spring, with these earth/water, practical/emotional alignments, we are more likely to be able to understand the changes over the past year and to set our course for a new one, which shall come to fruition next Spring. Imagine yourself a year from now and how you wish to be. This is a fortunate time, what with the Grand Trine and Calypso/Chiron sextiling that Trine, to honor your past self, your deepest self and to imagine your future holistic self.
By the way you can click on these photos to make them bigger. I would like them to come out bigger as I post them but don't know how to do that.
Time difference.
"Having said that," he continued, "what today's hearing was about was bringing out into public view the realities of decisions, like on Moynihan, like, for example, the Garden is now seeking public monies." (He said he'd seen documents that have not been made public.)
Not only did she send me my zippers, but she added a zipper pull and a Fortune Telling Fish!! Inside that little package is a red cellophane fish...you lay it on the palm of your hand and it curls up...and depending on which end curls your fortune is told... so fun!!
Success begins with a persons will
And little fear, and less surprise
As I try to navigate through motherhood, one thing I had to deal with is becoming a parent after losing a parent.
I'd like to spend my days with the parachutists in the crypt, reporting their discussions, describing how they live from hour to hour in the cold and the damp, what they eat, what they read, what rumours they hear from the town, what they do with their girlfriends when they visit. I would like to tell you about their plans, their doubts, their hopes, their fears, their dreams and thoughts. But that isn't possible, because I know almost nothing about any of it. I don't even know how they reacted when they heard about Heydrich's death, although that ought to make one of the best bits of my book.
When a ruthless revolutionary sets out to overthrow the crown, he makes the royal family his first target. Blood is shed in Buckingham Palace, and only sixteen-year-old Princess Eliza manages to escape.
Corporate monopolies are not the enemies of the Empire of Poverty, though its functionaries and propagandists spend a great deal of time insisting that this is the case. But that is because the Empire needs enemies and scapegoats. Yet the Empire has drawn the bulk of its support from the ranks of the very organizations that it condemns. The growth of unsustainable corporations and governments have come side by side, both engaging in unworkable practices, as its officers move back and forth from boardrooms to cabinet meetings.
The Lexus is so classy. I guess I’ve become a bit of a snob. I like driving a nice car, but right now it’s not very practical. Yet, I hold on. So the question for me, is it about self-image or laziness? Do I want to drive 365 days a year, or look good 355? Several people are pushing me to a Subaru, but it just doesn’t feel right… I’m leaning towards an Audi Quattro, an AWD car. No more rear wheel drive for me. I’d get a newer Subaru, but a plusher drive in the Audi. Both used cars, of course. Who wants to be practical? Today, I want to be practical. In March I’ll regret it.
Arguments against the validity of alien abduction hinge a lot on the nature of these sorts of hallucinations, sleep paralysis, and vivid dreaming, but neither the skeptic nor the believer sees the whole picture the way it's perceived by actual abductees or string theory physicists, or those of us who have truly hallucinated or understood the full terrifying breadth of Jung's collective unconsciousness. The truth is this: both arguments--mere mirage/illusion and 'more real' than reality-- are terrifyingly correct. Dreams are as real as anything else in our consciousness, and our five senses are just feelers into the physical realm. We have a whole other feeler, the third eye, which we've been conditioned to belittle, but which also 'hears' and 'feels' and 'sees' in a whole separate way from the external senses, even more vividly.
Though this month is dedicated to Breast Cancer Awareness month, to me the big "C" is still the same, irregardless which type it is. So please take the time, to care yourself and always show heaps of gratitude to your love ones and to those who have family or friends who are battling their big "C" battle right now, give them unconditional support as every little bit helps.
The other two front yard beds need some help. This one is a very dry west-facing rock garden. The lilies did well last year, and I want to plant more snow-in-summer. I'm not sure if the shrubs will survive. The diablo ninebark were transplanted out of the front garden bed, and I did a horrible job of replanting them. One of them will probably make it, but who knows about the other.
All this to say that a couple days after my stats exam sat the chemistry exam, looming nefariously in the near distance. I therefore began studying for my chemistry final the day before. This was clearly not a smart decision, so that night, I decided I would stay up for as long as possible to study, go to bed, wake up at five o’clock and resume (my exam was at 8:30 in the morning).
Oh yes, we reached there at 12pm haha when they were still not open yet! Do note that you only can pay cash for the cupcakes so do bring along enough!
LESSON #6. Passions don’t have to be gigantic or earth-shattering. The feeling I get when I am writing or speaking or training or facilitating is but one of my passions, and I am lucky enough to get paid for it most of the time. But this passion doesn’t change the world, and it doesn’t have to. I don’t have to drop the other aspects of my life to pursue it. I don’t have to pursue it to the exclusion of other passions. I don’t have to do it all day, every day. And no one else has to notice (for the most part – it is kind of lonely to speak or train to an empty room. I’ve done it – it sucks.) Some people have passions that have indeed changed the world: think Nelson Mandela, or the Dalai Lama, or one of thousands of others. And that is absolutely wonderful. But the vast majority of us have passions that we pursue in relative balance and anonymity, whether it’s building a time machine, or working with legos, or making music, or learning karate, or playing solitaire. It is not the passion itself and its impact on the world that is gigantic; it is the freedom to pursue it that counts.
Ambulatory Health Care Services
Beauty and the Beast
Well, that’s all for now!
1/4 teaspoon ground nutmeg
"If Scottish single malt is a rushing mountain burn, all the flavors jostling for position, Japanese malt is a limpid pool where all is revealed."Japan gabblers of my stripe sharpen our knives and sneers for such generalisations, but there is a beauty and lyricism in Broom's writing, and a truth in what he says, that disarms me completely. I learned something on every page of the Atlas's chapter on Japan. By way of fuller illustration, the paragraph from which the sentence above was taken is worth quoting in full:
You were lovely and went by way too fast, per usual. I didn't get out of bed until noon. I did laundry, a little bit of homework, watched a little of the red carpet, and the premiere of The Walking Dead (fitting, as that is how I feel this morning. Like one of the walkers.)
After lunch we packed up and headed over to our safari/petting zoo in a neighboring town. My "AR mom" joined us as well as her daughter as grand-daughter who are here from
At the last minute (as in, everyone was sitting at the dinner table, ready to go), I decided to make some strawberry whipped cream. Basically, I whipped some whipping cream, added sugar, added pureed fresh strawberries and called it a day.
Plastic Sheet:
21For Moses, from times long past, has his preachers in every town, reading his law in the Synagogues every Sabbath.
I may be forced to put down the electronic quill for good: there is no way I can hope to achieve this level of insight and understanding into the inner workings of the conflict here in Afghanistan. It’s this kind of soul-crushingly quality of perception that makes me feel all warm and fuzzy whenever anyone says, “2014 is gonna be a great year.”
The arrests came less than 12 hours after authorities formed a task force called Operation Random Shooter, which consisted of 30 investigators from the Tulsa Police Department, the Tulsa County Sheriff's Office, the U.S. Marshals Service and the FBI.
This is a basic example of using a rhyming scheme but then deliberately breaking it. The effect is very quick in this example and you can experiment with longer poems and shorter poems. Again, this is a personal choice. Just remember that in poetry, there is no right and wrong.
That is exactly what was happening, our children ‘feel’ their way through life, they can ‘sense’ how those they are close to are feeling within. While I was experiencing fear, despair, dis-empowerment, Connor could ‘feel and sense’ my raw, negative emotions/energy/vibrations, so of course he went deeper into his world to escape feeling my negative energy that he could feel and sense. I am not blaming myself for autism in my child, nor am I blaming anyone else, but there is an amplified awareness our children have that makes them energetically sensitive to all things in their surroundings.
Oh how she wishes it was different
25. Do you believe in obeying the scriptures? read this… (2 corinthians 13:12) +
When we first got together, it was sweet and young and … perfect. I was head over heels. But things became complicated quickly. He was an up and coming athletic star and I was working in hospitality. So basically he worked hard in the day, and I worked hard at night. His lifestyle demanded routine and healthy living, mine … not so much. But we were determined to make it work.
Also available are reworks from Gemini, Lil Silva, Two Armadillos, Marcus Intalex, and we haven’t even heard the mixes from Damon Albarn, Clams Casino, and Woodkid & The Shoes yet. The latter’s preview is up on Amazon and it already sounds potentially amazing.
You can find every episode for all six seasons by using the drop down menu above.
find some way to stop by anyway..
This dazzling flowering shrub or tree, relatively new to gardeners and flower enthusiasts, has already won its fair share of awards and praises, including the 2007 Plant of the Year Award at the National Tropical Plant Industry Exhibition in Florida. It’s an extraordinarily beautiful addition to almost any landscape design growing 5-6 feet tall as a shrub and up to 15 feet as a tree. Although technically not an evergreen, it provides year-round dark green foliage resembling a fiddle or a spoon, depending on your imagination.
Well, it would seem that the question of whether it was a good idea to produce bottled beers with higher strengths than cask equivalents isn’t really a burning issue, with “not concerned either way” winning out, and the antis slightly pipping the pros.
22C Founders Canadian Breakfast Stout 9.4%
i can't wait for you to meet her!
natalie & lynsey decided to re-arrange our bonus room...put up christmas lights...move furniture....use blankets from all over the house....yes, this is something years ago would of drove me NUTS....my OCD ADHD self would of not liked this so much....lynsey knows me well as does natalie (let's hope so after all she is my daughter) i knew they would put everything back in it proper place when they were done watching movies all night....garrett came up and his expression says it all "mom is gonna kill you" you'll be happy to know no one was injured and to be honest....i am very proud of myself that i didn't freak out....i guess the older i get the more laid back i get....fyi: i still have a long way to go according to my kids ;) i am a work in progress and i for one am proud of the progress i've made ;)
Robert Downey Jr. is at his best, once again, and could have overshadowed all the other characters easily but it’s the clever writing and equally strong performances by Chris Evans, Mark Ruffalo, Chris Hemsworth, Scarlett Johansson and Jeremy Renner that balances’ the equation quiet brilliantly. Each of the heroes took their sweet time and their not so sweet ways to come to terms with the concept of working together. Initially, I was surprised to see Mark Ruffalo as Bruce Banner but after seeing the movie, I would accept that it was the right choice.
I'm no beer racist, I'm just a simple kind of man.
Coming home from lunch today I was behind a thirty-something-year-old guy at a stop sign when I saw him chuck a Big Gulp cup out his window. This a total trigger for me. And knowing that it is a trigger I heard myself say, "Oh, dang it," because I knew I would have to follow him and confront him about it. Yep, I just knew that about myself.
I couldn’t resist just one more Erdem dress, not least because this one is named after my sister. Or so we pretend. It’s as good an excuse as any to be included here. That, and the stunning swallow print, that stirs in my mind the whirring fall-to-earth of swirling sycamore leaves…
The paper found that nitrogen oxide, a compound found in welding fumes and/or metal dusts, was identified as a compound responsible for low birth weight and spontaneous abortion among dental assistants.
This year Navrathri Pujai starts on Wednesday, the 28th September. There is a practice to arrange Dolls/Golu Padi on Mahalaya Amavasya day, which is considered auspicious day. Also Kalasa Sthapana is done on that day, choseing an auspicious time. The Pujai starts from the next day (i.e.) Pradamai and continues till Navami.
Minnesota 7-Feb 40 2 17 1 9
9 grandchildren
11. I sure hope some of you take the time to read it since I took the time to write it. LOL!!!
I can't remember where I got this idea. I would give credit where credit is due, if only I could remember who it was due to. I think I read this in a magazine. Once upon a time, in a former life, I read magazines. I had more time to read for leisure then. I used to even have a subscription to Southern Living. Those were good times.
We had a combined party with Aunt Katie. He birthday is the 5th, it was also the only weekend I was off and daddy was in town. So, I stayed up way late making cake pops, 3 differnt flavors. We had chocolate, strawberry, and red velvet. Making them wasn't so hard or time consuming, it was decorating them. We couldn't just have plain old cake pops ya know?
Today have a beautiful blue shimmer released by Milani for their Spring 2012 collection. Milani "Sail Away" is a medium blue creme with blue and silver shimmer. Almost a perfect match for the deep blue shimmer of the ocean.
They are basically preteen stage of cabbages, only available in spring and early summer time.
-the change she's looking for to become a new 'her' (hello weightloss!)
This past Saturday was a monumental day for my little brother as he graduated from Grand Valley State University with a Bachelor’s of Business Administration in Marketing with a Sales emphasis.
All winter, they stood like statues. Like beautiful, blooming memories that were cemented purposefully in my garden, as if trying to prove that they really did bloom last summer in profusion. Only with the casting process of fall and winter, their green life had been stolen, their blooms hardened into black, brittle seed pods, their summer beauty lost to only the remaining brown sticks and stems.
not keeping up with the calendar boils down to two issues:
For The Veronicas look, I decided t0 feature the look that Lisa wore in a photo shoot done in a recording studio sometime in 2012. I loved the look she wore in these pictures because it is essentially the look that has been their signature since the very start of their career, only a much sleeker, more mature version of it. They both look absolutely stunning in these images and I absolutely loved the look.
Plus, since she lost a box of summer clothes and it is sweltering in Texas, she is on a mission to find shorts. Therefore, she must shop. Yeehaw.
‘If the system had been allowed it could have meant a huge cost of development for other teams in such areas as chassis and under trays etc to make way for the provision for storing the system and the variable quantity of mass. The possible long-term consequences of such a system would be quite substantial because the system is in a crude state of development.’
Just a good old deploy and scrum in the centre. I deployed some archers on a flank and my girlfriend bunched up in the middle. There were no heroes since I was just teaching the basics. Armies advanced almost as they deployed for the first turn. My archers started firing from the beginning.
Mussolini's granddaughter Alessandra, a far-right member of the Italian parliament, denounced the ad. continues here
So I guess it's just time to show you the pictures......I hope you enjoy as much as I do!! And I love to hear from all of you, so don't be shy :)
I had asked him if he could ever date an ugly girl, and he said ‘I can’t date something that doesn’t exist.’
I can make a difference.
Before he could say anything else, you gently placed a kiss on his forehead. That action caused him to kiss you full on the lips for a long time. You both broke for air. After that kiss, you brushed his blonde, wavy hair out of his face and wiped the tears away from his deep purple eyes. He pulled you into a hug, while swaying back and forth.
Much of our interview with Joan focused on issues surrounding independence, which is understandable, but many of her comments also tell us what the SNP are doing and plan to do for young people. The policy that has garnered much media attention over the past couple of years is the SNP’s “free tuition fees” policy. The Scottish Government will pay for all young people’s tuition fees in Scotland, which is a great relief on young people who spend much of their time worrying about personal issues and their finances. The last thing they need is the burden of debt on their backs. Many students who will come out of university in England in the coming years will face a minimum debt of £27,000 thanks to their new tuition fee policy of £9,000 per annum. Loans they may take out for living costs throughout their student years will also add to this. While they don’t have to pay for their debt until they are earning over £21,000, it is still a huge worry to hang over a student’s head, who will no doubt be worrying about getting a job and decent accommodation.
R 1: Work 15 sc in ring, join with sl st in first sc.
Accents/Tools: Red ribbon, heart brags, 3D foam
After a brief pit stop at an old geological monitoring station to take shelter from the chilling wind, we began climbing again. The green landscape turned quickly and dramatically to nothing more than lichen-covered rocks and boulders. The clouds around us thickened until we were walking in an endless expanse of white, the wind began blowing the droplets of water in the air horizontally so that it whipped any exposed flesh on our faces, and the oxygen thinned noticeably.
April of last year. The decision that came out last week is a massive one (132 pages long!) and delves deeply on each of the issues. SCIL, the plaintiff is the owner of a large collection of songs and films. MySpace is a social networking website that allows users to share music, images and
On tonight`s bulletin news, I`ve decided to put some of my good articles as stickies, so that they don`t get lost. I`ll try to change them every few days.
Alicia Keys
The costly clothes won’t matter, that line your closet’s walls. Nor all the dollars that you spent in fancy stores and malls;
Jon Bon Jovi – Vocals, Guitar
You stand in the fire being unburn,
I think it is worth noting that Anni also experienced nausea yesterday although we didn’t eat together for lunch. Is it possible that this had something to do with what we ate for breakfast: corned beef, omelette and rice? We will never know but I’m hoping it will never happen again at this point.
5. Flashpoints – I played through one Flashpoint, so I cannot say that they will all be as enjoyable… but I am hopeful. A Flashpoint is effectively a “dungeon instance” with a storyline. Like with much of the game, there are cinematic moments that break up the gameplay. To not be too spoilerific, let me give an example: your Flashpoint may start off in an outpost on the surface of a planet, and as you progress you board a shuttle and dock with a ship in orbit to continue the campaign.
The dog situation has been challenging. There is no fenced in area, so we have had to just take them out on leashes to do their business, but the property is full of weeds with stickers on them. The stickers don't bother the pads of the dogs' feet, but when Midge crouches, they get stuck all over her long butt hair, so I'm going to have to shave her tail end. Scrappy's short hair hasn't been a problem. I have also had to use shorter leashes, because if they drag on the ground, thousands of these little stickers get embedded in the leashes.
Remember, Santa likes go getters. But he doesn't like assouls so don't be an assoul about it.
It is not, mind you, a good film. I would not want to risk burying that very significant truth. Rape revenge is already a spectacularly tricky genre to pull off well (in fact, I can't confidently state that it ever has been) because it is so easy for it to race straight into the most dubious kind of exploitation movie hell, and while I can name plenty of films that are just straight-up ickier than Mother's Day - The Last House on the Left itself being among them - that hardly implies that Mother's Day itself is in anyway restrained or classy or intelligent about its subject matter.
Many of the students I work with have been exposed to things that are years beyond their maturity level. Sexual innuendos, conversations, letters, looks, etc. are not at all uncommon to see as you walk up and down the hallways. There is an 8th grade boy who has a reputation as a “player” around school. He has at least 2 girlfriends at any time and several more girls willing and waiting to replace the currents. The males on staff frequently pull him aside and chat with him.
He was right on the beat, it was sharp and it had just enough Motown groove. I would have liked just a little more hip action from him, but otherwise I thought he did a great job. I can’t believe he went from bottom two last week to top of the leader board this week. Wow!
2. sauté peaches, add salt
the angel topper is wax, from post-war Nuremberg;
Yes, let us be glad and rejoice in his salvation. It is the very best love ever!
with a flat heat element tip on it…(I much more prefer using this tool because it has tons of multi uses as apposed to a rhinestone setter).. and threaded the ribbon with a ribbon slide at the top……LOVE the impact of how this turned out…….
Menu Plan
In its first full year of operation, 4.4 million vehicles used the tunnel, while in 2009 that figure was 27.7 million.
A Vintage Fabric store that is going out of business and having a 60 percent off sale.. wonderful seam bindings, laces, buttons and more!! Kristi & Tammy loaded up on goodies...
This is the quilt I'm working on for the wall in the baby's room. It will have some fun (and fiddly) sashing soon. I used the fabrics I showed you before and added a few extras to get more variety. I think I like it so far.
She stopped laughing. He looked at her puzzledly, not quite comprehending the whole episode. He was lost in this movie he was starring in. She reached out for the lighter and box of cigarettes in his hand, took and lit two cigarettes, before passing him one.
Scripture tells us to flee temptation (1 Corinthians 6:18; 1 Corinthians 10:14; 1 Timothy 6:11; 2 Timothy 2:22), but endure trials (James 1:12). That brings us to the question: What’s the difference between a trial and a temptation?
“Aunt Hayley,” Lily-Rose cried, launching into her arms. “I had such a fun time. What an adventure.”
and meet mine in flow,
“It was agreed that it was to be printed in my printing office. Henry C. Murphy was made the editor and Alfred G. Stevens was named as publisher.
Given the measly 8GB of onboard storage (although US users can, as we mentioned before, buy a 16GB version for just $20 more), you’ll need to invest in a microSD card to start loading the Acer Iconia Tab A200 full of media.
Officials say the program no longer accepting new patients, and public health authorities have concluded that there was no scientific value to it, At one point, 14 people were getting government pot. There are four left. The government has only continued to supply the marijuana “for compassionate reasons,” said the National Institute on Drug Abuse. Marijuana is getting a new look from states considering calls to repeal decades-old marijuana prohibition laws. There are 16 states with medical marijuana programs. In the three West Coast states, advocates are readying tax-and-sell or other legalization programs.
If you are using the oven, place a rack over a rimmed cookie sheet. Place the hens breast side down, brush with butter and roast 20 minutes per pound, turning breast side up half way through and brushing breasts with butter.
‘Jesus called them together and said, “You know that the rulers of the Gentiles lord it over them, and their high officials exercise authority over them. Not so with you. Instead, whoever wants to become great among you must be your servant, and whoever wants to be first must be your slave— just as the Son of Man did not come to be served, but to serve, and to give his life as a ransom for many’ Matt 20.25-28 NIV.
When nothing works, objectors and opponents threaten to institute legal proceedings. The “I will sue you” mentality is quite widespread. It seems to be the final answer to one’s frustrations, grievances and selfish interests.
Mass/Morning Prayer/Stations of the Cross
Stereotypes aside, we all have our own personal geographies. The places we've lived have sharp details; the places we've been are a little hazier. Places we've read about, seen on the news or in movies, exist somewhere in our brains, but barely.
With a dare I say almost perfect fruit cake sitting proudly on the counter.
This is why, although I’d love to write a mystery (I even have a great idea for a series), it will probably never happen. I can’t see how you can write aimlessly like I do if you want the mystery to work. It’s not just the dropping of hints and the well-placed red herring, you have to know what’s happening next and next and next.
Is balance important to you? Is it a concept that you incorporate into your wellness? What strategies do you use to create harmony and balance in your life? Please share your thoughts in the comment section.
Cranberry Eggnog Bread Pudding
Defence Minister Lindiwe Sisulu revealed in December that chartered flights for VIPs spiked from R3.6m in 2009 to R16.9m last year.
As host of Session #52, I’ve decided not to focus on the substance of beer, but the material that plays a supporting role. Bottles, coasters, cans, labels, ads, tap handles, church keys, hats, t-shirts, tip trays, glassware and signs have been collected by fanatics ever since beer has been sold.
The pleasant and desirable garden,
I've got loads on in the coming weeks - I have got to make some wedding stationery samples, I want to make more stock to sell, I want to make a start on my Christmas cards - oh, and I want to blog some of the many cards that i've been making recently.
Breathing rapidly, she began to tire. She slowed her pace to a walk and looked back across the beach. The sand was so hot that waves of heat rose from it and blurred her view. A lone seagull screeched overhead.
Rogers, E. 1983. Communication and Development: The Passing of the Dominant Paradigm. Except for Communication Research. In: Gumucio-Dagron, A. and Tufte, T. eds. Communication for social change anthology: historical and contemporary readings. South Orange New Jersey, Communication for social change consortium, 110-125.
According to Kimerling, major semiconductor fab will be turning out integrated silicon photonic products later this year. The products are likely to be simple transceivers, but it shows that photonics is rapidly becoming a standard part of the chipmaking toolkit.
9. JAK
and in an upstairs bedroom
So much for threats. I am not intimidated that easily.
1kg chicken wings
I almost got backside 5-0s though, so you know, I've got that going for me to.
I need to seriously examine what worked this year and what did not.
Juan Jalisco sees a car blatantly run a red light and off he zooms to meet and greet the driver. I'm parked there for several minutes before I see someone chatting away on their cell phone. I fire up the V-twin and I'm off. I no sooner catch up to the vehicle when I see El Guapo riding his BMW (which happens to sound like a run away sewing machine) pull up along side me.
18. Shirin
He may have had it previously and he may have achieved it subsequently, but my classmates and I encountered him at a particularly vulnerable stage in his life. When I met him he was around forty years old and had come to St. Antony’s only recently, after the small country school in which he had worked had been closed, a victim of rationalisation. The contrast between dealing with a small number of country children of both sexes, spread over a number of classes all taught by the same teacher in the same room, and a large class of harder, more sophisticated town boys must have been considerable for him. But there were deeper reasons for his debilitating lack of confidence than just this.
Sensory Processing Disorder: Discipline
I was already in my nightgown when I asked him if he put away my chickens. Now, he usually puts away my chickens. I’m not sure how much he does it to help me; sometimes I think he just likes my chickens. Anyhow, he usually puts them away, but not always. So I have to ask him every day if he put away my chickens, so if he didn’t put them away, I can go do it. He’d already been in bed about forty-five minutes when I finally got there, so I put on my muck boots and put away my chickens. I told them that I wished I could just sleep out there with them. They like me and make soft little sounds to me when I come to tuck them in and pet them good night.
Gender: BOY
Whakarewarewa Village, or to give it it’s full name Tewhakarewarewatangaoteopetauaawahiao, is a living thermal village; living in the sense that a Maori tribe still live there today. The wharepuni - homes, sit amongst the thermal pools, swirling steam and geysers that are synonymous to Rotorua, and it’s essentially a tourist attraction by day and a Maori village once the gates shut to their paying visitors at 5pm every day.
I refuse to subscribe to the ideology that love causes people to overlook faults. Listen, if you can’t see your other half’s faults, then that is not love. That’s something else, which I shall not discuss here, but will only say this: Love does not make someone perfect … It makes the relationship “perfect.”
PAUL WAPPAT (BBC RADIO NEWCASTLE)
He is now “allowed” to tell people I have Lupus. No more lying.
what do you like about your dad?
You love the friend who just "stands by."
Lime juice – 2 teaspoons
Well, I’m not gonna spoil it for you! You can check it out for yourself! And remember that you can always watch the show live and catch other cool moments everyday on Kidd TV.
But she maintains she is not on “welfare She is, however, very much on public assistance.”, since SSI is basically a welfare program for the disabled who are indigent, which also brings Medicaid healthcare benefits with it (hospitalization, major medical and prescription assistance). And she is on food stamps, which she does not believe is welfare because she doesn’t get a check every month. And she is on Medicaid, which is also not welfare in her eyes because she does not get a check every month. But all these benefits are forms of public assistance funded by the taxpayers.
Between prepping for the baby and the new semester starting at the school I work at, it's been a hectic week around these parts. We finally got the crib bedding in and the changing table is FINALLY on its way! I can't wait to show you all the finished nursery. Granted, it's not as amazing as I would have liked it to be, mostly because we're not painting. I'd love to do chevrons on the wall or make a gorgeous mural but we're hopefully going to sell the house in the next year and it's just too much of a pain to have to paint twice.
CAC 2012
In a moving tribute, President S.R. Nathan said: “To know Mrs Lee’s greatness, one has to listen to what has not been said of her until now. Mrs Lee was great in many ways – as a legal luminary, as a mother of an illustrious family, and more than that, for her stoic presence next to Mr Lee Kuan Yew during times of turbulence and tension in the many years of his political struggle.
The guide aims to find the best food and dining experiences in Queensland, and awards "Chef's Hats" as part of a rating system to brilliant, very worthy restaurants.
1388 ***D-VII/4/2001. “On Reading, Once Again, the Declaration of Independence.” Fourth of July Celebration, Chicago, Illinois. (Incorporated in Item B-12, above, pp. 371-72 (2002), and Item C-2003(2), pp. 820-21.)
The consequences of this failure could be that, in future, public servants wanting a pension have to put up with working longer, paying more and receiving less than they would have had to had UNISON's lay leadership asserted the primacy of their interests.
This was a senior RUC officer’s standard operating procedure. And yet, incredibly, in the four years from the creation of the SB50 to the time of his murder, it wasn’t felt necessary to advise Superintendent Buchanan of its existence, or its contents.
cold and unforgiving
Just look into her ice-colored eyes
The main character is about to do something. The narrative skips back to their childhood and explains why the thing they’re about to do makes sense. Then it skips forward again and the main character does the thing. The end. There’s not necessarily anything wrong with this approach, but it doesn’t work with flash. It’s too short. The opening section is never interesting enough to make the reader care about the background, the middle bit seems forced or twee, and the ending is just an exercise in tying loose ends.
Right, little stop in for today. I have a new medication to take to try and help me sleep so I’m excited to try that out. It’s Nitrazepam. Will be updating tomorrow to let you all know how it went!
^_^
Uhhhmmmkay.
Nope. I’d love to try it but won’t get a chance to before The Man separates from the Navy.
Mr Janin told CNN that one generator producing 1,000 litres a day is ‘enough to provide water for a village or town of 2,000 to 3,000 people’.
As the title says...PINK. So splash some pink on your card or project and you could win two of Amy's Gorgeous Sweet Pea Image sheets from Crafty Purple Frog
An acute case of verbal diarrhea has arrived to plague Israel recently and I just wish that one of Israel’s wonderful biotech companies could invent a remedy that would get all these pundits, analysts and wannabe prophets to simply shut their mouths, lay down their pens and turn off their keyboards on the subject of Iran.
J and I, being the type of parents to encourage our kids to help out around the house, and not under any circumstances to be pushed around by our offspring, immediately produced the same response.
Women’s Empowerment
I love this idea of reverse engineering all the lessons we tell people about how networking works. Certain people are great knowledge brokers and we should therefore find the ‘best’ one in each of the areas we are interested in and follow them, not just everyone we know.
We had a bowl of soup for lunch and set off for the winery Schatzle just outside town where we were greetd by the jovial Thomas Schatzle. He took us off to a picnic spot overlooking the terassed vinyards.
Concerning Daniel and his friends, the Babylonians changed their home, their ideas, their language, their diet – even their names. This is what we would call a form of brainwashing. Most people today were brainwashed as children to believe in a type of evolution which contradicts the Bible. They have been brainwashed to believe that the Earth is “billions and billions” of years old, when, according to the Bible, it’s only around 6000 years old.
Article 13 An agriculture administrative department of the people’s government at the county level or above shall timely submit the results of demarcation and adjustment of the prohibited agricultural product production areas within its administrative area to the Ministry of Agriculture for archival purposes.
Popularity can be bought, just sign up for facebook and pretend to be who you are, you’ll have plenty of friends in no time.
Procter & Gamble has agreed to never again run an ad for its CoverGirl mascara because it used “enhanced post-production” and “photoshopping” to make eyelashes look thicker than they were in real life. P&G agreed to the ban even though it disclosed in the ad that the image was enhanced.
She added that recent studies have shown “what the level of testosterone in a given room can produce when you do trading.”
Now Disney must accommodate the Hijab. And what if these Hijabs morph into the Taliban style Burkas? Why do the needs of the wearer, to hide all but the eyes, trump the sensitivities of the paying public, the understandable focus of the employer? Why does the Islamic disdain of certain Minnesota taxis for dogs and alcohol take precedence over the cab rider’s normal and standard needs? Why install at our universities footbaths, Shariah compliant toilets, Hallal cafeterias and private prayer areas for a vociferous minority when every other minority (and there are many indeed) managed for decades in peace and mutual tolerance without demonstrations or violence?Read more…
Our actual anniversary was yesterday, the 27th. I had decided on my way home on Sunday night that I was going to try to surprise Steph on our anniversary, so with the Bennetts watching Caylee for the evening, I headed down to see her after work. It was a lot of driving to fit in one evening, but it was worth it to see the surprise on her face when I walked in the hospital room. It was a short visit, but after a romantic meal of cafeteria cheeseburgers and Diet Dr. Pepper, we sat back and watched Levi buzz around the room playing basketball and chatting up a storm. He had a platelets transfusion earlier in the day, and was feeling great. It was cute to see him acting goofy, trying to make us laugh, and destroying Steph's collection of quilting magazines.
Have you ever gotten that feeling in the back of your head that there’s something not quite right about the way you think? I’ve always daydreamed about things others have considered impossible or ridiculous. I’m the loon who decided statistically charting various vampires’ awesomeness was a good idea.
we had a few of those to discuss.
Trista, Herald of the Fel, 4, Alliance
That was twelve years ago. I would love to say that aging with Spina Bifida has been easy, but it hasn't. I've had more brain surgeries over the past ten years than I have had in my entire life. Frustrating, but comes with the territory. But I am no longer angry about my life and no longer want to be 'like everyone else.' I am proud of who I am and I've come a long, long way. I like my life and I like the tough cookie I've become. I am now a published writer, with two short stories under my belt. I own my own crochet company, The Mad Crocheter, and I am a psychology student, well on my way towards obtaining my Master's degree. Without all the complications, I would never be where I am today.
You can set a photo as your background, or choose from a multitude of gorgeous backgrounds, from fun and colorful to texturally intriguing.
My Punkin Ale from Dogfish Head Brewery arrived today. I knew it because the mail guy told me I had a package, and someone over 21 had to sign for it. Happy happy dance! Punkin Ale will be consumed tonight. Sweet. 7% Alc. by Vol. Oooh, drunken Thursday? No, I should go easy tonight. I've only been back in reality for one day.
I am not sure the suspended version would work any better for me. I have only paved roads between home, grocery stores, hardware stores, coffee, etc. and the Yak trails along comfortably on these surfaces with and without load.
I buy a new bath visor from Amazon and pray that it will be the solution to our bath time problems.
Tonight, I had the honor of attending my Christian fellowship Intervarsity’s Men’s Appreciation Night. Basically, all the junior class ladies put together a formal dinner for the junior class guys. They made some bombtastic food, prepped some really great videos and sharing, and all in all showed their appreciation for the guys in the fellowship. It was definitely a fun event (we also learned how to swing dance to Frank Sinatra, which was pretty awesome), and I’m very appreciative of their thoughtfulness! Full disclosure: the guys put on a similar event for the girls last year.
Hello, and happy Monday. I am back today with a new stencil pattern! I say "new", but really I borrowed the pattern from Sunny's Goodtime Paint - I just made my own stencil.
As I said above, that was one of the highlights. There were others and one was the spotting of not one, but two Brown Creepers, (Certhia americana). The Brown Creeper is another rarity for the San Angelo area, so I was very pleased to see these two. And, by the way, since I had never saw one before this was lifer number 241 for me, if anyone is keeping count. I did get photos for confirmation, but they are not publishable quality by my standards. They are good enough for identification purposes.
It is with a heavy heart I blog today.
OK–enough of that.
Image Stamp - Fairy Kira - Tickled Pink Stamps
The first Chipotle opened in Colorado in 1993, and since has spread across the nation. With 100 percent of its pork naturally raised, more than 60 percent of its beef naturally raised, and as much naturally raised chicken as it can muster, it’s the poster child for local farming. College students with broken hearts, empty stomachs, and splitting head aches line the restaurant’s wall morning to night, knowing their cure lies at the end.
Here is the text of the first stanza from the Ralph Vaughn Williams version:
Pure in heart: will see God
Among other things, today my therapist told me I need more in my life. She knows her stuff, she knows trauma and attachment, and she was encouraging me to detach some from S. She told me I am creating a space for him to do whatever healing he is going to do. I can't control how much healing he actually does, and in the interest of surviving the next 5 years I need to detach from the outcome. Continue to provide that space for him, but also focus on what I need. Figure out what it is that I need, and work to get those needs met-- because clearly, right now, they are not being met.
Now that your first motif is finished...
I received this complimentary galley from the publisher and net galley for this review. All opinion expressed are my own.
Ram and I are so hooked onto American Idol these days that we wager and compete to predict who’s getting eliminated. And celebrate when the one we did not like goes out.
The greatest friend a girl could ever hope for in life. Someone who believes in things for you that you would never dream to imagine for yourself. Who believes you are the most amazing and accomplished person he's ever met. Only, he has the ability to make every single one of his children, children-in-law, grandchildren, and wife feel that way.
- Dermalogica Skin Prep Scrub
Hope your Thanksgiving was a terrific one filled with the things that truly do matter--family, friends, hope, happiness, health, laughter and lots and lots of love!
These last few days we have been finishing up our chores. Tomorrow we will move from the marina back out to the anchorage. Maneuvering through all the anchored boats will again be a challenge, and there are now quite a few boats anchored in the bay so we may have to look around for a spot.
An unfinished essay or a join of the dots?
Number of known survivors, 868.
Audience Applause
people, this is the most innovative and intriguingly honest perception yet, of America's roots and growth. Ey, An amazing work - very labor intensive - and worthy of a PhD (in my humble opinion, but what do I know). Your index is just as intense as the text, for God's sake! Finished your book, "Beads On a String!" Perfect for home-schooling;
Noel
Five minutes later, Joe texted again. "How long is he grounded for?"
* Red and blue food coloring
Now to what I have been doing. The first layout was from a sketch challage from scrapbooking haven (click here http://scrapbookinghaven.ning.com/events/april-sketch-challenge ) The sketch was from a layout that Marissa Page had done. My take is....
(come to think of it, I am picky about a lot of things when it comes to my children:))
19. Harm’s Way 5.09 (87/98)
2. We need to decide on a maximum size.
All I know is that whenever I’m in Montmartre, I find an excuse to stop by the Rue des Abbesses bakery and indulge.
Hope you're well!
Act Three begins in the same stage configuration left in the first act but the lights are darker, everything looks cold and desolate, ghastly. Several open graves almost wait for the last survivors to be buried. Death dominates life! Gurnemanz is tired on his/male side of the stage, while Kundry, breathing heavily, is the only one on the female side. Parsifal will soon arrive, dressed like a Tibetan monk, with a Holy Spear in his hands.
Borstal Breakout
“For men, as a rule, love is but an episode which takes place among the other affairs of the day, and the emphasis laid on it in novels gives it an importance which is untrue to life. There are few men to whom it is the most important thing in the world, and they are not the very interesting ones; even women, with whom the subject is of paramount interest, have a contempt for them.”
Thank you to living4bliss over at Mental Health Food for nominating me for this award, this touched me deeply. When you are able to inspire someone to stop and think or inspire someone to try something different to improve their life and someone takes notice of your efforts to make a difference in the world…it really is a good feeling. I hope that my journey in life is able to inspire, that makes opening up my personal story on this blog worthwhile. : )
Hopin’ that someone will take him down
PS If you are interested in learning more about Real Science 4 Kids's Physics textbook you can check out the Pre-Level I sample here. And here's the link to the sample of Level I. LD just finished reading Pre-Level I this morning and as I said above, he really enjoyed reading it. I plan to use other materials for our activities so don't have any recommendations one way or the other about the teacher's manual or lab workbook.
Earth. The judge’s bench (“bank”) is a moveable feast, his black robes
Very few people could spy
Funny: Just now the gingercat (Claire) just looked over my shoulder and noted that the type slug caption sounded like something a key chopper would say. I prefer to think of is as the sound of a type face connoisseur.
Finally some 9 and a half hours after we left for school we were free to come home.
We pulled up back at the front door of the bar from which we'd left pretty much on time. I was so glad to have the night over that I think my spirits were as high at that point as at any other during the evening.
stand fast;)
And then Candy Gourlay told everyone about the joys of using the internet. Which was ace cos I realised that I'm doing some things right!
That being said, I am COMPLETELY APPALLED by the national dialog that seems to imply that only single sluts who can't keep their knees together use birth control. Really?!?
This too shall pass.
Soon after introductions, we headed out for the tour. We began with Lia walking us through the tour and talking more in-depth about each piece and each artist that we saw, answering any questions that we had along the way. After that, she sent us off on our own for about 30 minutes to take photos. I hustled to take as many good shots as I could while keeping in mind Lia’s helpful hints from earlier. Surprisingly, I only got a little bit lost during my solo sojourn, a rare achievement in my life–so rare that I usually factor in time for getting lost any time that I wonder outside of Manhattan (or, frankly, any time that I wander beyond Manhattan’s directionally-helpful grid of streets and avenues). Finally, I made it back to the starting point, the first in the group to do so (look at me, being on time and even early!).
Vianna NJ, Kovasznay B, et al. Infant leukemia and paternal exposure to motor vehicle exhaust fumes. JOM 1984; 26: 679-682.
All for today... time for
This is the story of two teenagers who, in the middle the Chinese Cultural Revolution, are sent to the Phoenix Mountains to be re-educated because of their bourgeois origins. There they will share the lives of the rural population, their struggles and difficulties. In this place they will meet a young seamstress with whom Luo, one of the boys, will fall in love. They will also get hold of a suitcase full of banned books which will become the door to far away worlds, to love and to freedom.
over big sunglasses ...
Here's the real deal for those who are eager to see it play out in full, uploaded to YouTube by "jennings861." (Check out the other two parts if you want to see the complete episode.) She's not actually "bleeped", so pay attention and hear how precisely her remark was cut out by the sound editor. Why this gem of a clip never made it to any of those Game Show Moments Gone Bananas specials hosted by Ben Stein (available on DVD by Mill Creek Entertainment) is mystifying, but as the "Cigar Lady" came in at #11 on Entertainment Weekly's list of the "25 Funniest Game Show Bloopers", it's beginning to get the recognition it deserves.
Bugs and Kisses w Wood Stained $14.00
On UPGRADE AND AFTERLIFE, Gastr Del Sol's David Grubbs and Jim O'Rourke carry most of the load themselves, in contrast to the more collaborative nature of their earlier albums. Although John McEntire and violinist Tony Conrad do make appearances here, Grubbs and O'Rourke are engaged in a continual joust with a bevy of sophisticated found sounds. The Sea Incertain is the best example of this cut-and-paste style, blending slow-moving piano figures with the hiss of a low-register clarinet.
We did walk back down after our time visiting the castle.
I hate Mondays. It is such a letdown from the weekend. Although, this weekend was kind of a letdown. The highlight of my weekend was dinner with one of my oldest friends (no, she's not old, I've just known her a long time!), Aimee. We went to Cheese-ology for some yummy mac and cheese and then topped it off with some FroYo. I always enjoy getting to catch up with her and we are attempting to make it a monthly get together. Saturday my friend Sara and I were supposed to hang out and we ended up at Applefest, a local church's fair. I was expecting a big deal and got nothing in return. I had bad nachos and the entertainment that we saw left a lot to be desired. We managed to somewhat save the evening with dinner at Tony's. Sunday, I was supposed to go apple picking but Mother Nature decided to show us her ugly face and poured most of the day.
94:2 In ancient India, the Rishis living in the woods got their fire by rubbing two sticks together. These they called Arani. Brahma on earth is explained by Nilakantha to mean the Vedas, the Brahmanas, and the Sacrifices.
let’s say
you all haven't seen before for the feature. I figured it would be OK to share these close-ups,
We showed up.
There WERE corners where the paint sat however -and that's where the Ridgid Muli-Max Tool came in.... we bought some 60 grit pads for it's sanding head attachment, stuck them on, and went to town on the corners that the palm sander wouldn't reach! (sorry no pics of this step)
“Katie, tell you what, I walk you to the office. You can use the phone there to call someone to pick you up.” Ted turned and started to walk away.
I'd transferred back to the Chattanooga area because I was looking to promote at some point this year. And now, it's looking next to impossible.
Director : Stuart Simpson
Although I have no evidence, I'm fairly certain that the long-ago combox troll who reminded me that the arts are for people with TALENT was neither a mother nor an artist, and I would pretty much bet my life that she wasn't both those things at the same time. And while his scathing email ended my friendship with the "friend" who had suddenly become a self-appointed music critic and, though unmarried and childless himself, a marriage-and-parenting authority (this friend also helpfully brought up the "unspeakable crime" I'd committed against my unborn child years before he knew me, and years after being absolved), and while I no longer follow him nor his fairly prolific work for various online outlets, I would be willing to bet that he has remained unmarried and childless, because, seriously, with a personality like that what are the chances?
quote of the day - "most of the shadows of this life are caused by our standing in our own sunshine" - ralph waldo emerson
For awhile now I've been trying to think of a little present I could make for our grandchildren for Valentine's Day. I wanted to make something that would remind them of my husband and I, so I naturally gravitated to something that would hold them, hug them, and keep them warm -- just like us.
Each is 5x8 inches, drawn in brown colored pencil on hot press arches 140lbs watercolor paper. I'm lovin' the arches block!
“If Lim feels he has done wrong, then there is no harm in him apologising.”
When Hannah starts at a new school, all the other girls are in firm friendship groups and she feels left out and lonely. Mum and Dad know that a puppy would make a perfect pal for Hannah, so they take her to Battersea Dogs & Cats Home where she meets Huey the husky.
All I ask you to do is take responsibility for yourself and if you are working or intend to drive the following day think about how much you drink the night before, because the morning after the night before might just be an unexpected nightmare.
The war of 1811-1812 was in fact a very nasty and bloody conflict, unlike the earlier skirmishes. Stockenstroom was killed and Graham was lucky to escape with his life.
Like a hell-broth boil and bubble."
Flaming light
LOCATION: Springton Manor Farm in Glenmoore, PA
We had such a great time.
According to Hall, a commanding officer from Sandton arrived, and he then tried to reason with this officer.
Responding to customer requests, our chefs have created a line of Light in Sodium soups with all the flavor and goodness of our regular soups, but containing 50% less sodium. Contains 340 mg of sodium compared to 690 mg in Amy’s regular cream of tomato soup. No GMOs – No bioengineered ingredients. All dairy ingredients are made with pasteurized, rBST hormone free milk. USDA organic. Certified organic by QAI. Ready serve. Gluten free. This Cream of Tomato Soup is made from organic sun-ripened tomatoes slowly simmered to bring out their natural sweetness. Amy’s dad says it’s the best reduced sodium tomato soup he’s ever eaten. We’re sure that you’ll agree.
Seriously never in a million years would I have thought that I would actualy be able to step foot in NYC, what more on Liberty Island. Growing up Im sure most of us were fed with images of this grand dame & to actualy be THERE....there was this overwhelming rush of excitement, of surrealness.... I dont know, Im suaku like that. hahah. I've felt this feeling many times- at eiffel, big ben etc etc but the feeling just never lessens each time I see a place/landmark that I've always dreamt of seeing for the first time. (oh god my language fails me 2 years after school)
